

10-Q/A: ENERGIE HOLDINGS, INC. - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,794
-2.69
-0.01%






Nasdaq

6,371
-11.66
-0.18%






S&P 500

2,470
-5.70
-0.23%









12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Chip stocks are cool again, but reality is here
                                





 
12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
                                





 
12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
                                





 
12:17 P.M. ET


                                  Starbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


                                  Wage-rebound story takes another hit after drab ECI report
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      Why McCain shot down Obamacare repeal               
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      What is an ICO?
                                





 
12:06 P.M. ET


                                  Trump’s sketch of New York City skyline auctioned off
                                





 
12:04 P.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
                                





 
12:01 P.M. ET


Updated
      Health-care fund managers say a spike in drugs and devices will produce big returns
                                





 
12:00 P.M. ET


Updated
      These companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
                                





 
12:00 P.M. ET


                                  Stock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses
                                





 
11:59 A.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo will pay $80 million to overcharged auto loan consumers 
                                





 
11:56 A.M. ET


Updated
      Gold aims for third-weekly gain as dollar holds loss after GDP report
                                





 
11:56 A.M. ET


Updated
      Charting a bull-trend whipsaw, Nasdaq’s key reversal fuels sector rotation (again)
                                





 
11:51 A.M. ET


Updated
      A global investment strategist offers up a summer reading list to make you a better investor
                                





 
11:50 A.M. ET


Updated
      This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
                                





 
11:50 A.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
                                





 
11:49 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
                                





 
11:48 A.M. ET


Updated
      What the solar eclipse on Aug. 21 will mean for stocks
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q/A: ENERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.
    








    By

Published: Nov 13, 2014 11:53 a.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  The following discussion should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included herein. In connection with, and because we desire to take advantage of, the "safe harbor" provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we caution readers regarding certain forward looking statements in the following discussion and elsewhere in this report and in any other statement made by, or on our behalf, whether or not in future filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Forward looking statements are statements not based on historical information and which relate to future operations, strategies, financial results or other developments. Forward looking statements are necessarily based upon estimates and assumptions that are inherently subject to significant business, economic and competitive uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond our control and many of which, with respect to future business decisions, are subject to change. These uncertainties and contingencies can affect actual results and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in any forward looking statements made by, or on our behalf. We disclaim any obligation to update forward looking statements.  Overview  On December 31, 2013, Energie Holdings, Inc. (we, us, our, the "Company", "Energie" or "Holdings") entered into a Share Exchange Agreement (the "Share Exchange Agreement") with OELC, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and its wholly-owned subsidiary, Energie LLC (hereinafter jointly referred to as, "Energie"). The Share Exchange Agreement was not effective until July 2, 2014, due to a variety of conditions subsequent that needed to be met which are described below. Upon effectiveness, Holdings issued 33,000,000 "restricted" shares of its common stock, representing approximately 65% of the then issued and outstanding voting securities, in exchange for all of the issued and outstanding member interests of Energie. This transaction is considered to be a capital transaction, rather than a business combination, equivalent to the issuance of ownership interests by Energie for the net assets of Holdings, accompanied by a recapitalization (the "Share Exchange"). The accounting is identical to that resulting from a reverse acquisition, except that no goodwill or other intangible is recorded.  Thereafter, on January 27, 2014, Holdings entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the "Merger Agreement") with two of its then wholly owned subsidiaries, Energie Holdings and Alas Acquisition Company ("Alas"). The Merger Agreement effectively merged Alas with and into Holdings, with Holdings being the surviving corporation. The net effect of the Merger Agreement was to effectuate a name change from Alas Aviation Corp., to Energie Holdings, Inc. in order to provide a better understanding to investors of the Company's entry into the LED lighting industry. The Company's management also changed. On February 13, 2014, our trading symbol changed to "ELED" to reflect the change in our name and plan of operations.  We are focused on growing and acquiring specialized LED lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both commercial and residential interiors. The lighting products will include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. Our objective is to grow, innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated with solid state lighting. Our management team and advisory board is comprised of experienced executives in the lighting industry with recent specific focus on the LED lighting industry. The group has over 300 years of combined experience in this industry.  Énergie was founded in 2001and is engaged in the import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets in North America. We have developed an end-to-end production and distribution platform for imported lighting products featuring HID, fluorescent, and LED technologies. Long term contracts with five European manufacturers and one in Taiwan provide us with exclusive North American distribution rights to over 270 total products in 37 categories. After processing any modifications necessary to meet UL standards and building code requirements, the products are sold to customers through a network of over 60 independent lighting sales agents. In addition to a 15% commission structure, we provide our sales force with promotional materials, product training, and technical support.  Our principal place of business is located at 4885 Ward Road, Suite 300, Wheat Ridge, Colorado, telephone (720) 963-8055. We also maintain a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. Our website is www.energieholdings.com.  Table of Contents 11  As a result of the Share Exchange, Energie is considered to be the "accounting acquirer" and, accordingly, is treated as the predecessor company. The condensed consolidated financial statements include the results of operations and financial position of Energie for all periods, and the results of operations and financial position of Holdings as of and for the three months ended September 30, 2014. Further information about the historical results of Energie may be found in our Current Report on Form 8-K/A, filed with the SEC on October 3, 2014.  Our independent accountants have expressed a "going concern" opinion. Our condensed consolidated financial statements have been prepared assuming that we will continue as a going concern, which contemplates the realization of assets and liquidation of liabilities in the normal course of business. The condensed consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustment that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.  Results of Operations Comparison of results of operations for the three months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013 Three months ended September 30, 2014 2013 Change % Sales revenue $ 248,549 $ 197,656 $ 50,893 26 % Cost of revenue (136,377 ) (93,503 ) (42,874 ) 46 % Gross profit 112,172 104,153 8,019 8 % Total operating expenses 726,741 495,223 231,518 47 % Interest expense (104,429 ) (22,144 ) (82,285 ) 372 % Other income (expense) 43,305 80,465 (37,160 ) (46 )% Net loss $ (675,693 ) $ (332,749 ) $ (342,944 ) (103 )%  Sales Revenue, Cost of Revenue and Gross Profit  Sales revenue, cost of revenue and gross profit each increased for the three months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in 2013, because an increase in our borrowing allowed us to increase our funding of our revenue generating activities.  Operating expenses   Three months ended September 30, 2014 2013 Change % Compensation $ 208,456 $ 127,144 $ 81,312 64 % Commissions 45,376 21,491 23,885 111 % Depreciation and amortization 39,536 61,705 (22,169 ) (36 )% General and administrative 433,373 284,883 148,490 52 % $ 726,741 $ 495,223 $ 231,518 47 %  Operating expenses for the three months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in 2013, increased primarily due to a) including the compensation expense for Holdings employees beginning in the three months ended September 30, 2014; b) increased commissions related to our increase in sales; and c) increased general and administrative expense associated with the Share Exchange, consisting primarily of professional fees.  Table of Contents 12  Other  Increased interest expense resulted from our increase of debt to approximately $4,575,000, an increase of approximately $2,000,000 over 2013 levels. We have been using debt financing to provide supplemental cash to fund our operations.  Other income consisted of miscellaneous income, offset by the expense associated with factoring our accounts receivable, which had decreased activity in the three month period ended September 30, 2014, compared to the same period in 2013, as we move towards collecting our receivables rather than factoring them.  Comparison of results of operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2014 and 2013   Nine months ended September 30, 2014 2013 Change % Sales revenue $ 587,920 $ 1,553,941 $ (966,021 ) (62 )% Cost of revenue (302,191 ) (672,088 ) 369,897 (55 )% Gross profit 285,729 881,853 (596,124 ) (68 )% Total operating expenses 1,837,649 1,653,260 184,389 11 % Interest expense (284,406 ) (88,764 ) (195,642 ) 220 % Other income (expense) 115,394 55,385 60,009 108 % Net loss $ (1,720,932 ) $ (804,786 ) $ (916,146 ) (114 )%  Sales Revenue, Cost of Revenue and Gross Profit  Sales revenue, cost of revenue and gross profit each decreased for the nine months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in 2013, because we had an unusually large order of over $950,000 in the first half of 2013 and a slower than usual first half in 2014, which we attribute to not having sufficient working capital to grow the product offering.  Operating expenses   Nine months ended September 30, 2014 2013 Change % Compensation $ 463,025 $ 480,240 $ (17,215 ) (4 )% Commissions 93,306 346,259 (252,953 ) (73 )% Depreciation and amortization 166,662 160,270 6,392 4 % General and administrative 1,114,656 666,491 448,165 67 % $ 1,837,649 $ 1,653,260 $ 184,389 11 %  Operating expenses for the nine months ended September 30, 2014, as compared to the same period in 2013, increased primarily due to a) increased general and administrative expense associated with the Share Exchange, consisting primarily of professional fees; b) compensation expense for Holdings employees beginning in the three months ended September 30, 2014; partially offset by c) a reduction in compensation expense as we tried to manage costs in 2014; and d) decreased commissions related to our decrease in sales.  Table of Contents 13  Other  Increased interest expense resulted from our increase of debt to approximately $4,575,000, an increase of approximately $2,000,000 over 2013 levels. We have been using debt financing to provide supplemental cash to fund our operations.  Other income consisted of miscellaneous income, offset by the expense associated with factoring our accounts receivable, which had decreased activity in the nine months ended September 30, 2014, over the same period in 2013, as we move towards collecting our receivables rather than factoring them.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  At September 30, 2014, we had $18,304 in cash. We have not generated positive cash flows from operations. Accordingly, our sources of liquidity may include potential debt and equity offerings. We believe that our principal difficulty in our inability to successfully generate positive cash flows has been the lack of available capital to operate and expand our business. We believe we need a minimum of approximately $2,500,000 in additional working capital to be utilized for a) development and launching of new products for Energie; b) funding the business development efforts to identify, qualify and acquire other LED lighting companies; and c) the balance for working capital, and general and administrative expense. Other than as disclosed below, we have no other commitments from any investor or investment-banking firm to provide us with the necessary funding and there can be no assurances we will obtain such funding in the future. Failure to obtain this additional financing will have a material negative impact on our ability to generate profits in the future.  To fund our acquisition plan and fund working capital for our continuing operations, we are continuing to seek out and discuss financing with potential partners or lenders. While no assurances can be provided, we expect that we will be able to obtain financing to implement our plans.  On July 16, 2014 we entered into an Investment Agreement and Registration Rights Agreement with Dutchess Opportunity Fund, II, LP ("Dutchess"). Pursuant to the Investment Agreement, Dutchess committed to purchase, subject to certain restrictions and conditions, up to $5 million of our Common Stock upon issuance by us of a put to Dutchess at a price equal to ninety-four percent (94%) of the lowest daily VWAP (volume weighted average price) of our Common Stock during the five (5) consecutive Trading Days beginning on the Put Notice Date and ending on and including the date that is four (4) Trading Days after such Put Notice Date. The Put Amount shall be equal to up to either 1) two hundred percent (200%) of the average daily volume (U.S. market only) of the Common Stock for the three  Also, in the third quarter of 2014, we entered into two Securities Purchase Agreement with KBM Worldwide, Inc., ("KBM") wherein we agreed to issue 8% convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $93,000. The note may be converted into shares of our common stock at any time beginning 180 days from the date of the note at a price equal to 61% of the average closing bid price of our common stock during the 10 trading days immediately preceding the date of conversion. In the event we fail to pay the note when it becomes due, the balance due under the note incurs interest at the rate of 22% per annum. The note contains additional terms and conditions normally included in instruments of this kind, including a right of first refusal wherein we have granted KBM the right to match the terms of any future financing in which we engage on the same terms and contemplated in such future financing.  Table of Contents 14  Working Capital  Working capital is the amount by which current assets exceed current liabilities. We had negative working capital of $6,233,937 and $4,151,360, respectively, as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013. The increase in negative working capital is due to the assumption of the accounts payable of Holdings from the Share Exchange of approximately $360,000, and the growth in accounts payable of approximately $1,100,000 associated with increased operating expenses. Although we are past due on our required payments under our debt agreements, the lenders have not made demand for repayment of the principal and interest due. If demand for payment is made by one or multiple vendors, we would experience a liquidity issue as we do not currently have the funds available to pay off these debts. We intend to enter into extension/forbearance agreements with each of the lenders; however, there can be no assurances that any of the lenders will be cooperative or that if they are willing to provide extensions or forbearances, that the terms under which they may be willing to provide them will be favorable to us. This raises substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern.  Cash Flows Our cash flows from operating, investing and financing activities were as follows: Nine months ended September 30, 2014 2013 Net cash (used in) provided by operating activities $ (165,716 ) $ 32,821 Net cash used in investing activities (25,097 ) - Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 171,243 (54,589 )  Net cash from operating activities was driven by our net loss, offset by an increase in accounts payable and unpaid interest expense. We anticipate that overhead costs in current operations will increase in the future if we are successful in raising the capital described herein as a result of our anticipated increased marketing and operating activities.  Net cash used in investing activities related to our continued spending to obtain UL Listing qualification for products in development.  Net cash from financing activities related to additional borrowings under existing debt agreements and the convertible debt we entered into in the third quarter of 2014.  Inflation  Although our operations are influenced by general economic conditions, we do not believe that inflation had a material effect on our results of operations during the nine-month period ended September 30, 2014.  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  We had no off-balance sheet arrangements as of September 30, 2014 and December 31, 2013.  Table of Contents 15  Critical Accounting Estimates  Our condensed consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. The preparation of these financial statements requires management to make estimates, judgments and assumptions that affect reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. We continually evaluate the accounting policies and estimates used to prepare the condensed consolidated financial statements. The estimates are based on historical experience and assumptions believed to be reasonable under current facts and circumstances. Actual amounts and results could differ from these estimates made by management. Certain accounting policies that require significant management estimates and are deemed critical to our results of operations or financial position are discussed in our Annual Report on Form 10-KT for the year ended December 31, 2013 in the Critical Accounting Policies section of Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.  Nov 13, 2014  (c) 1995-2014 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Tesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?


All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart


Second-quarter U.S. GDP speeds up to 2.6%















Most Popular





The dark side of cruises





Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.





Dow ends at record, but tech slump weighs on S&P 500, Nasdaq





If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one





How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 



















ExeLED Holdings, Inc. 10-K Apr. 17, 2017 12:56 PM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»ExeLED Holdings, Inc. (ELED)FORM 10-K | Annual ReportApr. 17, 2017 12:56 PM|About: ExeLED Holdings, Inc. (ELED)View as PDF

 Energie Holdings, Inc. (Form: 10-K, Received: 04/17/2017 12:58:42) 












	U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION




	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549



	__________________


	 



	FORM 10-K



	__________________


	 


	(Mark one)


	 


	[ x ]       ANNUAL REPORT
	PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF


	1934


	 


	FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31,
	2016


	 


	[ ]	TRANSITION REPORT UNDER SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE
	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 	1934 for the transition period from ________________ to________________________.


	 


	Commission File Number


	000-28562




	 




	EXELED HOLDINGS INC.




	(Exact name of registrant as specified
	in its charter)


	 







	Delaware






	 






	94-285754

	8








	(State
	or other jurisdiction of




	Incorporation
	or organization)





	 




	(I.R.S.
	Employer Identification No.)






	 




	5310 Ward Road, Suite 106,





	Arvada, CO 80002




	(Address of principal executive offices)


	 




	(720) 361-2056




	(Issuer’s Telephone Number)


	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant
	is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes [_] No [X]


	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant
	is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Act. Yes [_] No [X]


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the
	issuer (1) filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months
	(or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements
	for the past 90 days. Yes [X] No [_]


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the
	registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive Data File required to
	be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months
	(or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files).


	Yes [X] No [_]


	 






	 








	 









	 








	Indicate by check mark if disclosure
	of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of
	registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form
	10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. [ ]


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the
	registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See definition
	of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller reporting company” in Rule
	12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):


	 





	Large accelerated filer  




	[ ]




	Accelerated filer




	[ ]






	Non-accelerated filer




	[ ]




	Smaller reporting company




	[X]





	 




	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell
	company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes [_] No [X]


	 


	The aggregate market value of the voting
	and non-voting common stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant, based upon the closing sale price of the Registrant’s
	common stock on June 30, 2016 was $214,119.


	 


	As of April 12, 2017, the Registrant had 249,447,433 shares
	of common stock issued and outstanding.


	 






	 









	 









	TABLE OF CONTENTS



	 



	 






	 




	 





	Page
	No.







	 




	 




	 






	PART I




	 




	 






	Item 1.




	Business




	1






	Item 1A.




	Risk Factors




	7






	Item 1B.




	Unresolved Staff Comments




	7






	Item 2




	Properties




	7






	Item 3.




	Legal Proceedings




	8






	Item 4.




	Mine Safety Disclosures




	8






	 




	 




	 






	PART II




	 




	 






	Item 5.





	Market
	for the Registrant’s Common Equity and Related Stockholder Matters




	and
	Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities






	 




	9







	Item 6.




	Selected Financial
	Data




	10






	Item 7.





	Management’s
	Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition




	and
	Results of Operations






	 




	11







	Item 7A.




	Quantitative and Qualitative
	Disclosures About Market Risk




	16






	Item 8.




	Financial Statements
	and Supplementary Data




	16






	Item 9.




	Changes in and Disagreements
	on Accounting and Financial Disclosure




	32






	Item 9A.




	Controls and Procedures




	32






	Item 9B.




	Other Information




	33






	 




	 




	 






	PART III




	 




	 






	Item 10.




	Directors, Executive
	Officers and Corporate Governance




	34






	Item 11.




	Executive Compensation




	37






	Item 12.





	Security
	Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management




	and
	Related Stockholder Matters






	 




	38







	Item 13.




	Certain Relationships
	and Related Transactions, and Director Independence




	38






	Item 14.




	Principal Accounting
	Fees and Services




	40






	 




	 




	 






	PART IV




	 




	 






	Item 15.




	Exhibits, Financial
	Statement Schedules




	41






	 




	 




	 






	 




	Signatures




	43











	 






	 









	 







	FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENTS




	 



	This Annual Report
	on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements. The statements contained in this Report that are not historical in nature, particularly
	those that utilize terminology such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “likely,” “expects,”
	“anticipates,” “estimates,” “believes” or “plans,” or comparable terminology,
	are forward-looking statements based on current expectations and assumptions, and entail various risks and uncertainties that
	could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in such forward-looking statements.


	 


	We cannot predict
	all of the risks and uncertainties.  Accordingly, such information should not be regarded as representations that the
	results or conditions described in such statements or that our objectives and plans will be achieved and we do not assume any
	responsibility for the accuracy or completeness of any of these forward-looking statements.  These forward-looking statements
	are found at various places throughout this Report and include information concerning possible or assumed future results of our
	operations, including statements about potential acquisition or merger targets; business strategies; future cash flows; financing
	plans; plans and objectives of management, any other statements regarding future acquisitions, future cash needs, future operations,
	business plans and future financial results, and any other statements that are not historical facts.


	 


	These forward-looking
	statements represent our intentions, plans, expectations, assumptions and beliefs about future events and are subject to risks,
	uncertainties and other factors.  Many of those factors are outside of our control and could cause actual results to
	differ materially from the results expressed or implied by those forward-looking statements.  In light of these risks,
	uncertainties and assumptions, the events described in the forward-looking statements might not occur or might occur to a different
	extent or at a different time than we have described. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements,
	which speak only as of the date of this Report.  All subsequent written and oral forward-looking statements concerning
	other matters addressed in this Report and attributable to us or any person acting on our behalf are expressly qualified in their
	entirety by the cautionary statements contained or referred to in this Report.


	 


	Except to the extent
	required by law, we undertake no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information,
	future events, a change in events, conditions, circumstances or assumptions underlying such statements, or otherwise.


	 


	 










	 








	 









	 









	PART I



	 










	ITEM 1.






	BUSINESS







	 





	History




	 


	ExeLED Holdings Inc. was
	incorporated in the State of Delaware on October 20, 1986 under the name “Verilink Corporation.” We have also been
	known as Energie Holdings, Inc. and

	Alas Aviation Corp.

	On December 31, 2013, we
	entered into a Share Exchange Agreement (the “Share Exchange Agreement”) with OELC, LLC, a Delaware limited liability
	company, and its wholly-owned subsidiary, Energie LLC (hereinafter referred to as, “Energie”). The Share Exchange
	Agreement was not effective until July 2, 2014 due to a variety of conditions subsequent that needed to be met, which are described
	below. Upon effectiveness, we issued 33,000,000 “restricted” shares of our common stock, representing approximately
	65% of our then issued and outstanding voting securities, in exchange for all of the issued and outstanding member interests of
	Energie. The accounting is identical to that resulting from a reverse acquisition, except that no goodwill or other intangible
	is recorded.


	 


	The closing of
	the Share Exchange Agreement was conditioned upon certain, limited customary representation and warranties, as well as conditions
	to close, such as the total shares of Energie Holdings, Inc. issued and outstanding being limited to 51,000,000, and the completion
	of an audit of Energie’s financial statements. Following the execution of the Share Exchange Agreement, but prior to closing,
	an additional 400,000 shares were issued and the limitation of 51,000,000 shares was waived, allowing for the issuance.


	 


	Thereafter, on
	January 27, 2014, we entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the “Merger Agreement”) with two of our then wholly
	owned subsidiaries, Energie Holdings, Inc. and Alas Acquisition Company. The net effect of the Merger Agreement was to effectuate
	a name change from Alas Aviation Corp., to Energie Holdings, Inc. in order to provide a better understanding to investors of our
	entry into the light-emitting diode (“LED”) lighting industry. Our management also changed. On November 30, 2015,
	we filed a Certificate of Amendment to our Certificate of Incorporation with the State of Delaware to change our name from “Energie
	Holdings, Inc.” to “ExeLED Holdings Inc.”


	 


	As a result of these transactions
	we are now a holding company, with Energie acting as our operating subsidiary, engaged in the business of the import and sale
	of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets in North America. Our creative lighting
	products include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting
	to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. Our current business objective is to become a leading provider
	of advanced LED lighting solutions by acquiring and growing complementary LED based lighting fixture companies. We are focused
	on acquiring specialized lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both commercial and residential
	applications, with the intention to grow, innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated
	with solid state lighting. These objectives are subject to our obtaining additional financing, of which there can be no assurance.


	 


	All references herein
	to “us,” “we,” “our,” “Holdings,” or the “Company” refer to ExeLED
	Holdings Inc. and its subsidiaries, and their respective business following the consummation of the Merger and Share Exchange
	Agreements, unless the context otherwise requires.


	 




	Description
	of Current Business




	 


	Energie was founded
	in 2001and is engaged in the import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design
	markets in North America. Our headquarters is located in Arvada, Colorado, and we also maintain a production and assembly facility
	in Zeeland, Michigan.


	 


	During the years ended
	December 31, 2016 and 2015, the success we did have was with unique and LED products in several market segments. In particular
	we experienced demand in education, commercial office space, large multi-unit luxury residential and health care. Education was
	especially strong with activity across the spectrum of K-12 as well as public & private universities. We expect this trend
	to continue throughout 2017.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	1




	 









	 








	We have developed an end-to-end
	production and distribution platform for imported lighting products featuring HID, fluorescent, and LED technologies. Long term
	contracts with five European manufacturers and one in Taiwan provide us with exclusive North American distribution rights to over
	270 total products in 37 categories. After processing any modifications necessary to meet Underwriter’s Laboratories™
	(“UL/CUL”) standards, and building code requirements, the products are sold to customers through a network of over
	50 independent lighting sales agents. In addition to a highly competitive commission structure, we provide our sales force with
	promotional materials, product training and technical support.


	 


	We intend to capitalize
	on these European lighting companies’ desire to penetrate North American markets by solving many of the problems these producers
	encounter when approaching these markets. These obstacles include designs that do not meet UL/CUL standards and building codes,
	the need to provide appropriate North American oriented marketing and product information and specifications, experience to leverage
	the lighting industry sales agent network, and market based product supply.


	 


	Our business strategy
	is to enter into exclusive sales agreements with European suppliers that have unique lighting products and to bridge the divide
	between product desires of North American architects, lighting designers, electrical engineers, and interior designers who wish
	to access innovative European products and the desires of European manufacturers. As these European partners are continually developing
	new products, we collaborate in the fixture design process and have the right to launch such products in North America. In many
	cases, our partners will co-fund the frontend costs associated with launching new products. However, we require additional working
	capital to embark on our growth strategy. We estimate that we will need up to $2,000,000 in additional working capital to accomplish
	our initial business objectives of developing and launching new products for Energie, but significantly more capital to effectuate
	the acquisition campaign we have discussed elsewhere herein. See “Part II, Item 7, Management’s Discussion –
	Liquidity and Capital Resources”.



	 



	We have been, and
	continue to engage in, the design, development, enhancement, and marketing of advanced commercial grade illumination products
	that exclusively use LED’s as their light source in the continental United States, Canada and Puerto Rico. Our products
	include LED hanging and recessed ceiling fixtures, recessed wall fixtures and wall sconces. Our branded products have been installed
	in a wide variety of settings including commercial office space, financial trading floors, health care facilities, museums, schools,
	restaurants, retail stores and other public locations.


	 


	The latest analysis
	“2017 Global Lighting Market Outlook” published on November 2, 2016 by LEDinside, a division of TrendForce, finds
	that the LED lighting market was worth US $29.6 billion in 2016 and is to rise to US $33.1 billion in 2017. Meanwhile,
	the penetration rate of LED lighting is expected to reach 52%. Thanks to regional lighting development, LED lighting
	is expected to account for 23% of total lightings in Europe by 2016, which is the highest across the world. The second and third
	highest regions are to be found in North America and China. However, the Asia-Pacific region is experiencing the fastest growth
	rate in LED lighting.


	 


	According to a
	recent Freedonia Research report the LED Lighting Fixtures segment of the industry is estimated at $4 billion of architectural,
	specification-grade lighting fixtures with innovative, differentiated lighting products that exemplify:



	 








	·




	Energy
	efficiency focused on the disruptive LED technology;










	·




	High
	performance with respect to quantity and quality of light through superior optic design;
	and










	·




	Aesthetic
	design that appeals to the senses while allowing architects and designers to make strong
	visual statements by accessing European lighting fixture designers.





	 




	In order to secure
	such projects we cultivate relationships and build our brand through marketing and sales efforts aimed at decision-makers responsible
	for lighting; primarily architects, lighting designers, electrical engineers, interior designers, space planners and other product
	designators. We maintain a network of over 50 third-party sales agencies across North America to represent our products. Lighting
	sales agencies in the commercial lighting market are standalone, commission-based, geographically specific companies that represent
	many different manufacturers and represent only lighting fixtures and lighting control systems. We support our agents with sales
	and marketing resources to help drive “sell through” of our branded products. All products are assembled to Underwriter’s
	Laboratory requirements in our factory to control quality and meet lead time requirements of our customers.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	2




	 









	 








	Our business model
	and product strategy is based upon collaboration with leading European lighting manufacturing companies, including Rudolpf Zimmermann,
	Bamberg Gmbh, Bamberg, Germany, Regent Beleuchtungskorper AG, Basel, Switzerland, Trilux GmbH & Co. KG, Arnsberg, Germany,
	Multiline Licht NV, Lummen, Belgium, Luxiona-Troll, Canovelles, Spain and Tons Lightogy Inc., New Taipei City, Taiwan. Except
	for the agreement with RZB and Tons Lightogy, which were executed in 2012, each of these other agreements have been in place for
	over ten (10) years and are renewable for additional 2 year terms. Each of the agreements contain standard warranties, are either
	FOB manufacturer or CFR destination, and title and risk of loss passes to us upon delivery, when payment becomes due. Each also
	includes a list of products that are manufactured by each respective manufacturer. Order cancellation is allowed up until 21 days
	prior to delivery, except for Trilux, which requires a 6-month written notice. Thereafter, no cancellation is allowed. With the
	exception of Multiline Licht NV, the agreements are exclusive to us throughout North America.


	 


	The North American
	architectural and design community has long recognized that European lighting manufacturers have distinctive, innovative and technologically
	advanced product offerings. Arguably, we believe European designs and technology are several years ahead of what is available
	in North America. However, designers have historically encountered difficulties working with European manufacturers. Typical issues
	include product designs that do not meet UL/CUL standards and North American building codes, poor marketing collateral and product
	information, incompatible specification data, long lead times to receive product, poor sales support, limited customer service,
	and high overall cost and complexity due to exchange rates, freight, duties and other factors.


	 


	The European manufacturers
	have long viewed the North American market for architectural, specification-grade lighting as large and attractive. However, apart
	from a few isolated examples, attempts to penetrate this market by establishing wholly-owned U.S. operations have been costly
	and unprofitable and, as a result, many have failed. We believe the challenges the European manufacturers encounter include (a)
	incomplete understanding of the design and product attributes demanded by North American architects and designers; (b) incomplete
	understanding of UL/CUL and building code requirements; (c) inexperience working with indirect sales channels such as agents and
	distributors (European sales strategy is based on company employed direct salespeople); and (d) the overall high cost of “green
	fielding” and supporting U.S. operations.


	 


	To address these
	issues, we are seeking external financing and intend to expand our operations through the acquisition of related businesses that
	will complement our current business, should this financing come through.  There are many synergistic operations which
	have expressed an interest in being acquired by us due to our status as a publicly traded company.  We believe this
	makes economic sense, because we can eliminate duplication of general and administrative expense, provide more centralized information
	marketing and eliminate overlapping of services offered.  We are presently evaluating several such businesses as potential
	acquisition candidates and have engaged in discussions with other acquisition targets.  However, as of the date of this
	report there are no definitive agreements in place relating to our acquiring any such business and there can be no assurances
	that such agreements will be executed on favorable terms or at all in the future. If we are unable to obtain the external financing
	that we are targeting, we will not be able execute this plan and will not have the financial resources to continue operations.


	 


	Up to this point,
	our financing efforts have been unsuccessful and we can provide no assurances that they will be in the future. If they are unsuccessful,
	there will be significant challenges to remain in business. If we are successful in securing external financing and then in executing
	on our growth strategy, the acquisition of related, complimentary businesses is expected to increase revenues and profits by providing
	a broader range of services in vertical markets which are consolidated under one parent, thus reducing overhead costs by streamlining
	operations and eliminating duplicitous efforts and costs.  There are no assurances that we will increase profitability
	if we are successful in acquiring other synergistic companies.


	 


	Management intends
	to seek out and evaluate related, complimentary businesses for acquisition.  The integrity and reputation of any potential
	acquisition candidate will first be thoroughly reviewed to ensure it meets with management’s standards.  Once
	targeted as a potential acquisition candidate, we will enter into negotiations with the potential candidate and commence due diligence
	evaluation of each business, including its financial statements, cash flow, debt, location and other material aspects of the candidates’
	business.  We expect to utilize the issuance of our securities as part of the consideration that we will pay for these
	proposed acquisitions.  If we are successful in our attempts to acquire similar companies utilizing our securities as
	part or all of the consideration to be paid, our current shareholders will incur dilution.   We anticipate that we will
	need additional capital to make these acquisitions. We have had various discussions with investment banking firms and others potential
	investors but as of the date of this Report there are no definitive agreements to provide us with this funding and there can be
	no assurances that we will obtain this funding in the future. Failure to obtain this funding will have a material negative affect
	on our ability to implement our business plan and our anticipated results of operations. We are continuing to seek out and discuss
	financing with potential partners and lenders. While no assurances can be provided, we expect that many lighting fixture companies
	will be interested in consolidating with us to capitalize on the application of the disruptive LED technology.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	3




	 









	 








	Our objective is
	to become a leading provider of advanced LED lighting solutions by acquiring and growing complementary LED based lighting fixture
	companies. We are focused on acquiring specialized lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both
	commercial and residential applications. Our creative lighting products will include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state
	technology that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment.
	Our intent is to grow, innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated with solid state
	lighting. There are no assurances we will be successful.


	 


	Key elements of
	our business growth strategy include:


	 







	·





	LED
	Technology Leadership:

	As LED technology increases in the speed at which it is advancing,
	lighting fixture designs will have to adapt to that rate of change. Our Advisory Team
	intends to provide access to the best resources to apply LED technology for our subsidiaries.
	We also intend to provide buying contracts with LED component manufacturers to control
	cost while staying at the leading edge of the technology.






	 








	·





	Access
	to Investment Capital:

	The change from conventional lighting technology to LED technology
	is expensive. The capital needed to understand and apply LED technology is more than
	most conventional lighting manufactures have or are willing to risk. We intend to provide
	the appropriate capital to develop and launch LED lighting fixtures through our subsidiaries.
	As of the date of this Report we do not have sufficient capital to meet this objective
	and there are no assurances we will obtain this capital in the future.







	 









	·





	Best
	Practices Management Services:

	The business processes and staffing required to move
	to solid state lighting are different than those needed for conventional lighting technology.
	Our Advisory Team intends to provide assistance to our subsidiary teams to help them
	capitalize on these changes aggressively and cost effectively.






	 








	·





	Market
	Appropriate Education.

	We believe that educating architects, designers, specifiers
	and end-users of the benefits of LED lighting is key to growing our market share by shifting
	their preference from more traditional lighting to LED lighting. There continue to be
	unique advances in LED engineering and, while no assurances can be provided, we believe
	the market is rapidly embracing the technology. We also believe our employees have the
	knowledge and ability to educate both our customer base and, if successful, the personnel
	in the companies we acquire. We expect that this will drive sales by driving the commercial
	market towards LED lighting.






	 








	·





	Sales
	and Distribution Network:

	We maintain a network of over 60 third-party sales agencies
	across North America to represent our products. These agreements provide for exclusive
	rights to sell our lighting fixtures for a commission in specific counties as described
	in each agreement. If and when we successfully consummate acquisitions, each company
	that we acquire will have their own third-party sales agencies and distribution network.
	We are targeting acquisitions that will diversify our product portfolio. By carrying
	a broader selection of LED lighting products, we anticipate that we will be able to not
	just expand our existing network of sales agencies, but to also become more of a preferred
	provider of products to select sales agencies.






	 








	·





	Expanding
	our LED Product Portfolio

	. As our goal is to serve our customers and create a quality
	experience in both product and service, we will continue to expand these categories and
	add necessary fixtures and light sources to increase our offering as an LED solution
	provider.






	 








	·





	Developing
	and Protecting Our Intellectual Property

	. Securing and defending intellectual property
	by using the UL Listing process related to the design, manufacture and application of
	advanced lighting technology is expected to be a key element of our existing and future
	business. The strength of our intellectual property portfolio is intended to allow us
	to compete on the basis of our technology, which we believe will give us an advantage
	over many of our larger competitors.






	 












	·





	Capitalizing
	on Opportunities in Our Target Markets

	. We believe there is a growing need for unique,
	advanced lighting solutions across our target markets. Our acquisition strategy is to
	expand into new production application market segments by focusing on companies with
	complementary products. Because we have access to the advanced products from our International
	partners, we expect to continue to introduce innovative advanced lighting products as
	we believe there exists significant opportunities to grow market share. By introducing
	new products and expanding sales of existing products we believe that we can significantly
	improve operational efficiency by reducing our cost of materials, components and manufacturing.
	Expanding our products and increasing our sales will also allow us to gain additional
	leverage from sales representatives within our distribution network.





	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	4




	 









	 









	The LED Lighting Industry




	 



	The global lighting industry
	generally is divided between three major market segments: commercial, industrial and residential. Within these three market segments
	exist two broad product categories: fixtures and light bulbs (referred to as lamps in the lighting industry). The fixtures category
	includes all apparatuses, luminaires and power/heat-control systems, while lamps consist of the devices that emit light. Conventional
	lamps typically include incandescent, fluorescent and high-intensity discharge (HID) products. For commercial applications, we
	believe that the more expensive and long lasting fluorescent and HID lamps and fixtures have had the largest market share. For
	industrial applications, metal halide and fluorescent have been the primary light source. For residential applications within
	the general illumination market, inexpensive incandescent bulbs and, to a lesser extent, compact fluorescent (CFL) lamps have
	been the common choice.


	 


	With rapid advancements
	in the performance, efficiency and cost of energy-efficient lighting, including LED-based solutions, conventional light sources,
	such as incandescent lamps, are beginning to be replaced by advanced technologies with lower operating costs over their useful
	lives. LED’s are semiconductor-based devices that generate light. The energy-efficient nature of LED technology makes it
	an environmentally friendly light source, and the compact size of LEDs has created new possibilities in lighting fixture and lamp
	design. Product selection is influenced by a number of factors, including overall cost, energy efficiency, product life, lumen
	output and other product features, as well as regulatory and environmental factors. We believe our unique advanced lighting solutions
	are well positioned to increasingly displace conventional lighting in each of our targeted markets.


	 


	In North America, lighting
	manufacturers typically sell products through manufacturer’s representatives, electrical supply representatives, or an internal
	sales force to electrical wholesale distributors. The distributors then market products to electrical contractors and other end-users.
	Representatives also have direct contact with lighting designers, electrical engineers, architects and general contractors that
	influence buying decisions. The manufacturer’s representatives often provide value-added services, such as product promotion
	or design and implementation assistance. The ability of smaller companies to compete against larger, more-established rivals is
	heavily rooted in their capacity to leverage their unique product portfolios and customer service to garner maximum productivity
	from each representative.


	 


	Historically, large global
	competitors focused almost exclusively on the general illumination market, because of their advantage in purchasing power, manufacturing
	volume and distribution efficiency, while smaller industry participants generally competed in niche markets primarily by offering
	specialized products and superior customer service to their regions. However, the evolution of advanced lighting solutions has
	enabled smaller companies to penetrate and compete in the larger general illumination market. One of these notable advanced lighting
	solutions is LED lighting.



	 




	Industry Trends




	 



	As the cost of LED’s
	decrease and their performance improves we expect that they will continue to compete more effectively in the general illumination
	market versus traditional lighting. High-brightness LEDs are the core, light-producing components within an LED lighting system.
	We believe the LED lighting industry is experiencing the following trends

	:




	 








	·





	Technological
	Innovations Expand LED Functionality


	.

	Since the introduction
	of the first visible LED in the 1960s, the technology has offered an increasingly wide
	variety of colored lighting, beginning with red and expanding to green, yellow and orange.
	Initial rudimentary applications included traffic lights, automotive brake lights and
	indicator lights. In the mid-1990s, LEDs became capable of emitting blue light. With
	the advent of blue LEDs, combined with phosphor technology, LEDs made another technological
	leap by emitting white light. This breakthrough enabled LEDs to compete with traditional
	lighting solutions for applications in commercial, industrial and residential markets.
	In an effort to lower energy consumption, lighting companies are focusing on increasing
	“lumens per watt.” Lumens per watt (often referred to as “efficacy”)
	is an industry standard that measures the amount of light emitted per watt of electrical
	power used, meaning the more lumens per watt, the more energy-efficient the product.
	Traditional incandescent lighting sources can produce between 10 and 35 lumens per watt,
	while fluorescent and HID light sources can produce output exceeding 100 lumens per watt.
	Today’s LEDs are currently performing well over 100 lumens per watt at the LED
	level, making them comparable to, and often better than, fluorescent and HID light sources.






	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	5




	 









	 















	·





	High
	Energy Costs Drive LED Adoption.

	As a result of high energy prices and the expectation
	that prices will continue to rise, businesses and consumers are increasingly adopting
	new technologies to reduce energy consumption. LED lighting technology is inherently
	more energy efficient and can result in more than 80% power savings over incandescent
	solutions. According to The Department of Energy, 22% of all energy consumption in the
	United States is from lighting applications. This combined rate represents approximately
	35% of all energy consumption in commercial buildings as compared to approximately 15%
	for residential users and 5% for industrial companies. Despite safety issues and concerns,
	compact fluorescent (CFL) lamps are used for lighting energy conservation. However, recent
	technological advancements to LED lighting have made it more commercially viable in terms
	of brightness, efficiency, lamp life, safety and color-rendering (CRI). In addition,
	competitive pressures, declining LED costs and greater manufacturing efficiencies are
	driving down LED lamp prices. As a result of these gains and, while there can be no assurances,
	we believe LED adoption should continue to expand. In support of our belief, in the 2014
	report issued by Freedonia, LED fixtures are expected to account for over half of all
	lighting fixture sales in 2018. Higher value fixtures will account for a dramatically
	greater share of fixture sales as more fixtures designed specifically for LEDs, advanced
	fluorescent lamps, and other longer lived, highly efficient light sources are introduced.
	For instance, sales of LED lighting fixtures are expected to nearly triple through 2018
	to account for over half of total fixture sales, up from seven percent in 2008. In many
	cases, LED fixtures will replace existing fixtures designed for use with less efficient
	light sources as lamp stocks dwindle following phase out programs. Incandescent, halogen,
	and fluorescent fixtures will all register declining sales going forward. However, high
	intensity discharge (HID) fixtures, which are based on an older but relatively energy
	efficient technology, are expected to grow through 2018.






	 








	·





	Legislative
	Influences Spur Market Adoption of Energy Efficient LED Lighting.

	LED Lighting has
	encouraged regulatory agencies to increase the demand for more energy efficiency. Federal
	law, under the Energy Efficiency Improvement Act of 2015, mandates that commercial buildings
	use less electricity. After HVAC, lighting consumes the second most electricity in buildings,
	so it provides a great opportunity to decrease electricity usage. Also, lighting can
	be more easily retrofitted than HVAC so existing buildings are also a major opportunity.






	 




	Competition




	 



	We currently face competition
	from traditional lighting companies that provide general lighting products, including incandescent, fluorescent, high intensity
	discharge (HID), metal halide (MH) and other traditional light sources. We also have competitors from specialized lighting companies
	that are engaged in providing LED lighting fixture products. In general, we intend to compete with both groups on the basis of
	design, innovation, and quality of light, maintenance costs, safety issues, energy consumption, price, product quality and brightness.


	 


	In the general illumination
	market, we compete with traditional lighting companies that include Acuity Brands Lighting, Inc., Eaton’s Cooper Lighting
	Business (a division of Eaton Corporation), Hubbell Lighting, Inc. (a division of Hubbell Incorporated), Juno Lighting Group (a
	division of Schneider Electric SA), GE Lighting and Philips Lighting (a division of Koninklijke Philips N.V.). Our LED products
	should tend to be alternatives to conventional lighting sources for applications within the commercial and residential markets.
	In these markets, we compete on the basis of unique designs, performance, energy savings, lamp life, and durability.


	 


	We believe that we will
	compete favorably in our markets, based on the following factors:



	 








	·




	Breadth
	and diversity of high-quality LED product offerings;










	·




	Our
	expansive distribution network and developed relationships;










	·




	Innovative
	products at competitive price points;










	·




	UL/CUL,
	DLC and Energy Star certifications;










	·




	Ability
	to offer multiple levels of products;










	·




	Value-engineered
	products producing a fast ROI; and










	·




	Responsiveness
	to customers





	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	6




	 









	 








	We expect our markets
	to remain competitive and to reflect rapid technological evolution and continuously evolving customer and regulatory requirements.
	Our ability to remain competitive depends in part upon our success in developing new and advanced LED lighting solutions and introducing
	these products at competitive prices on a timely basis.


	 



	Intellectual Property




	 




	UL/CUL Listings



	 


	We have over 20
	UL files, which include UL Listings for over 14,000 products for sale in the United States and Canada. UL is an independent safety
	testing laboratory. A UL Listing means that UL has tested representative samples of the product and determined that it meets UL’s
	requirements. These requirements are based primarily on UL’s published and nationally recognized standards for safety in
	the US and Canada. UL’s testing certifies the design, construction and assembly of the certified products. UL Listings do
	not expire as long as the product certified is not materially changed. Ownership of a UL Listing may also be transferred between
	companies. Most commercial customers in the lighting industry will only buy UL listed products.


	 



	Trademarks



	 


	We have one
	registered trademark, “Energie.”


	 



	Employees



	 


	As of the date of this
	report we have five (5) full-time employees including our management, consisting of Harold Hansen, our President and Chief Executive
	Officer, Justin Kerns, our Chief Operating Officer as well as one additional employee, a bookkeeper, in our Colorado location
	and one person in production management and a product/production engineer, who work out of our Michigan location. Richard Cole
	Dennard, our current Chief Financial Officer, works with us as an independent contractor. We also retain additional part and full
	time employees on a temporary basis as needed to meet production schedules. Depending upon our backlog, we usually employ between
	2 and 14 people on a temporary basis. None of our employees are members of any union. We believe our relationship with our employees
	is good.


	 


	If we are able to obtain
	the necessary capital to implement our business plan and expand our operations, we expect to add additional employees in the areas
	of production, engineering, sales and acquisitions.



	 




	Government Regulation



	 


	We are not subject
	to any extraordinary governmental regulations.



	 










	ITEM 1A.






	RISK FACTORS







	 



	We are a smaller
	reporting company and not required to include this disclosure in our Annual Report on Form 10-K.



	 










	ITEM 1B.






	UNRESOLVED STAFF
	COMMENTS






	 


	Not applicable.



	 










	ITEM 2.






	PROPERTIES







	 




	Headquarters

	– Our principal place of business is located at 5310 Ward Road, Suite 106, Arvada, Colorado 80002. This space consists
	of approximately 1,550 square feet of executive offices and a conference room. This location is leased pursuant to a month-to-month
	term at approximately $1,500 base rent. This facility houses our sales, marketing, customer service, product development and accounting
	activities and is also used to train agents and provide educational seminars for architects, designers and specifiers within a
	classroom environment and fixture showroom.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	7




	 









	 








	Our manufacturing, production, assembly and fulfillment is handled from a
	23,000-square foot facility located at 200 E. Garfield Avenue in Zeeland, Michigan. This facility is leased from Symbiote
	Inc. which became one of our shareholders following the Closing under the Share Exchange Agreement. This facility holds
	inventory and assembles finished goods to fulfill customer orders. Production engineering, production management and
	production services are all accomplished from this facility. This facility is under a lease with approximately one year
	remaining at approximately $6,000 base rent with approximately $2,000 in monthly shared expenses.



	 










	ITEM 3.






	LEGAL
	PROCEEDINGS









	 



	In July 2015, Energie
	LLC and Harold Hansen, our CEO (collectively, “the Defendants”), were served with a summons and complaint wherein
	Vectra Bank Colorado, National Association brought an action to collect monies due pursuant to a promissory note in the current
	principal balance of $47,000, plus interest, costs, and attorneys’ fees. The action was brought in the District Court for
	the City and County of Denver, Colorado (the “Court”). On April 4, 2016, the parties to this action entered into a
	settlement agreement whereby the Defendants agreed to pay to Vectra Bank the sum of $59,177 on or before April 30, 2016. This
	payment was not made and the bank requested and received a judgment against both Defendants jointly and severally for $61,502
	plus interest of 5.25% per annum plus 9.90% per annum on the default margin.


	 


	As a result of our lack
	of available capital we are unable to pay many of our bills and outstanding promissory notes when they become due. While we have
	not been threatened specifically with litigation, it is impractical to believe or assume that our creditors will not pursue actions
	against us to collect balances due. Many of these obligations and agreements contain provisions requiring us to pay costs of collection
	and attorneys’ fees over and above the principal amounts due, which may increase these outstanding balances.



	 














	ITEM 4.






	MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES






	 


	Not Applicable.



	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	8




	 











	 













	PART II





	 












	ITEM 5.






	MARKET
	FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES
	OF EQUITY SECURITIES







	 





	Market Information





	 



	Trading of our common
	stock commenced on the OTCBB in July 2008, under the trading symbol “ALAS.” In January 2014, our trading symbol became
	“ELED,” which currently trades on the OTCQB.


	 


	The table below sets forth reported high and low bid prices for the periods indicated.  The
	bid prices shown reflect quotations between dealers, without adjustme

	nt for markups, markdowns or
	commissions, and may not represent actual transactions in our common stock.








	 




	 




	 







	Quarter
	Ended






	High






	Low







	March
	31, 2015




	$	0.025	




	$	0.01






	June
	30, 2015




	$	0.011




	$	0.006






	September
	30, 2015




	$	0.011




	$	0.003






	December
	31, 2015




	$	0.009




	$	0.002






	 




	 




	 






	March
	31, 2016




	$	0.005




	$	0.002






	June
	30, 2016




	$	0.007




	$	0.001






	September
	30, 2016




	$	0.002




	$	0.001






	December
	31, 2016




	$	0.0015




	$	0.0008







	 



	As of April 11,
	2017 the closing bid price of our common stock was $0.02.


	 


	Trading volume
	in our common stock has been very limited since we commenced trading.  As a result, the trading price of our common
	stock is subject to significant fluctuations.


	 




	The Securities
	Enforcement and Penny Stock Reform Act of 1990






	 




	The Securities and Exchange
	Commission (“SEC”) has also adopted rules that regulate broker-dealer practices in connection with transactions in
	penny stocks. Penny stocks are generally equity securities with a price of less than $5.00 (other than securities registered on
	certain national securities exchanges or quoted on the Nasdaq system, provided that current price and volume information with
	respect to transactions in such securities is provided by the exchange or system).


	 


	As of the date of this
	Report, our common stock is defined as a “penny stock” under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the
	“Exchange Act”). It is anticipated that our common stock will remain a penny stock for the foreseeable future. The
	classification of penny stock makes it more difficult for a broker-dealer to sell the stock into a secondary market, which makes
	it more difficult for a purchaser to liquidate his/her investment. Any broker-dealer engaged by the purchaser for the purpose
	of selling his or her shares in us will be subject to Rules 15g-1 through 15g-10 of the Exchange Act. Rather than creating a need
	to comply with those rules, some broker-dealers will refuse to attempt to sell penny stock.


	 


	The penny stock rules
	require a broker-dealer, prior to a transaction in a penny stock not otherwise exempt from those rules, to deliver a standardized
	risk disclosure document prepared by the SEC, which:


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	9




	 









	 













	·




	contains
	a description of the nature and level of risk in the market for penny stocks in both
	public offerings and secondary trading;










	·




	contains
	a description of the broker's or dealer's duties to the customer and of the rights and
	remedies available to the customer with respect to a violation to such duties or other
	requirements of the Securities Act of 1934, as amended;










	·




	contains
	a brief, clear, narrative description of a dealer market, including “bid”
	and “ask” prices for penny stocks and the significance of the spread between
	the bid and ask price;










	·




	contains
	a toll-free telephone number for inquiries on disciplinary actions;










	·




	defines
	significant terms in the disclosure document or in the conduct of trading penny stocks;
	and










	·




	convtains
	such other information and is in such form (including language, type, size and format)
	as the Securities and Exchange Commission shall require by rule or regulation;





	 


	The broker-dealer also
	must provide, prior to effecting any transaction in a penny stock, to the customer:



	 





	the
	bid and offer quotations for the penny stock;




	the
	compensation of the broker-dealer and its salesperson in the transaction;




	the
	number of shares to which such bid and ask prices apply, or other comparable information relating to the depth and liquidity of
	the market for such stock; and




	monthly
	account statements showing the market value of each penny stock held in the customer's account.






	In addition, the penny
	stock rules require that prior to a transaction in a penny stock not otherwise exempt from those rules; the broker-dealer must
	make a special written determination that the penny stock is a suitable investment for the purchaser and receive the purchaser's
	written acknowledgment of the receipt of a risk disclosure statement, a written agreement to transactions involving penny stocks,
	and a signed and dated copy of a written suitability statement. These disclosure requirements will have the effect of reducing
	the trading activity in the secondary market for our stock because it will be subject to these penny stock rules. Therefore, stockholders
	may have difficulty selling their securities.



	 





	Holders




	 


	We had approximately
	264 holders of record of our common stock as of the date of this Report, not including those persons who hold their shares in
	“street name.”


	 




	Stock Transfer
	Agent




	 


	The stock transfer agent
	for our securities is Pacific Stock Transfer, Inc. Their address is 6725 Via Austi Pkwy, Suite 300, Las Vegas, NV 89119. Their
	phone numbers are (702) 361-3033 and (800) 785-PSTC.


	 




	Dividends




	 


	We have not paid any dividends
	since our incorporation and do not anticipate the payment of dividends in the foreseeable future. At present, our policy is to
	retain earnings, if any, to develop and market our products. The payment of dividends in the future will depend upon, among other
	factors, our earnings, capital requirements, and operating financial conditions.


	 




	Reports




	 


	We are subject to certain
	reporting requirements and furnish annual financial reports to our stockholders, certified by our independent accountants, and
	furnish unaudited quarterly financial reports in our quarterly reports filed electronically with the SEC. All reports and information
	filed by us can be found at the SEC website,

	www.sec.gov

	and on our website, www.exeledholdings.com.




	 











	ITEM 6.






	SELECTED FINANCIAL
	DATA







	 



	Not required for
	a smaller reporting company.






	 

	Table Of Contents







	10




	 










	 














	ITEM 7.






	MANAGEMENT’S
	DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS









	 




	The following discussion
	should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in Item 8. We caution readers
	regarding certain forward looking statements in the following discussion and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and
	in any other statement made by, or on our behalf, whether or not in future filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission
	(the “SEC”). Forward looking statements are statements not based on historical information and which relate to future
	operations, strategies, financial results, or other developments. Forward looking statements are necessarily based upon estimates
	and assumptions that are inherently subject to significant business, economic, and competitive uncertainties and contingencies,
	many of which are beyond our control and many of which, with respect to future business decisions, are subject to change. These
	uncertainties and contingencies can affect actual results and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed
	in any forward-looking statements made by, or on our behalf. We disclaim any obligation to update forward looking statements.



	 




	Overview




	 


	We are focused on growing
	and acquiring specialized LED lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both commercial and residential
	interiors. The lighting products will include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology that can integrate
	with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. Our objective is to grow,
	innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated with solid state lighting. The management
	team and advisory board is comprised of experienced executives in the lighting industry with recent specific focus on the LED
	lighting industry. The team has over 300 years of combined experience in this industry.


	 


	We are engaged in the
	import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets in North America. Energie
	commenced business in 2001.


	 




	General Trends
	and Outlook




	 


	In 2016 and in 2015, our
	focus was on securing funding in order to implement our business plan to grow through acquisition. Accordingly, working capital
	was at a premium for us, which limited our ability to maximize our revenue-generating activities with Energie.


	 




	Going Concern




	 


	As shown in the accompanying
	consolidated financial statements, we had an equity deficit of $13,300,927 and a working capital deficit of $13,087,377 as of
	December 31, 2016, and have reported net losses of $3,455,227 and $2,995,626, respectively, for the years ended December 31, 2016
	and 2015.  These factors raise substantial doubt regarding our ability to continue as a going concern. 


	 


	Our ability to continue
	as a going concern is dependent on our ability to further implement our business plan, attract additional capital and, ultimately,
	upon our ability to develop future profitable operations. We intend to fund our business development, acquisition endeavors and
	operations through equity and debt financing arrangements. However, there can be no assurance that these arrangements will be
	sufficient to fund our ongoing capital expenditures, working capital, and other cash requirements. The outcome of these matters
	cannot be predicted at this time. These matters raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. The
	consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that might be necessary if we are unable to continue as a going
	concern. Additionally, current economic conditions in the United States and globally create significant challenges attaining sufficient
	funding.


	 






	Results Of Operations






	 




	The following selected
	comparative financial information for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 have been derived from and should be read in
	conjunction with our consolidated financial statements for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 included in this report.




	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	11




	 









	 














	Comparison of Results of Operations
	for the Years Ended December 31, 2016 and 2015




	 







	 




	 




	Year
	ended December 31,




	 




	 






	 




	 




	2015




	 




	2016




	 




	Change




	 




	%






	Sales
	revenue




	 




	$




	543,036




	 




	 




	$




	439,278




	 




	 




	$




	(103,758




	)




	 




	 




	(19




	)%






	Cost
	of revenue




	 




	 




	(328,971




	)




	 




	 




	(216,949




	)




	 




	 




	112,022




	 




	 




	 




	(34




	)%






	  Gross
	profit




	 




	 




	214,065




	 




	 




	 




	222,329




	 




	 




	 




	8,264




	 




	 




	 




	4




	%






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Total
	operating expenses




	 




	 




	1,834,549




	 




	 




	 




	1,515,792




	 




	 




	 




	(318,757




	)




	 




	 




	(17




	)%






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Interest
	expense




	 




	 




	(1,273,255




	)




	 




	 




	(1,872,684




	)




	 




	 




	(599,429




	)




	 




	 




	47




	%






	Other
	income (expense)




	 




	 




	(101,887




	)




	 




	 




	(289,080




	)




	 




	 




	(187,193




	)




	 




	 




	184




	%






	Net
	loss




	 




	$




	2,995,626




	 




	 




	$




	3,455,227




	 




	 




	$




	(459,601




	)




	 




	 




	15




	%







	 



	Sales revenue decreased
	by $103,758 during the year ended December 31, 2016, compared to 2015 due to an overall lack of funding necessary for development
	and product launch costs. Cost of revenue decreased proportionally more than the decrease in revenues due to an overall effort
	to keep all costs as low as possible.


	 



	Operating expenses




	 








	 




	 




	Year
	ended December 31,




	 




	 






	 




	 




	2015




	 




	2016




	 




	Change




	 




	%






	Research
	and development




	 




	$




	255,745




	 




	 




	$




	249,687




	 




	 




	$




	(6,067




	)




	 




	 




	(2




	)%






	Sales
	and marketing




	 




	 




	109,594




	 




	 




	 




	68,130




	 




	 




	 




	(41,464




	)




	 




	 




	(38




	)%






	General
	and administrative




	 




	 




	1,469,201




	 




	 




	 




	1,197,975




	 




	 




	 




	(271,226




	)




	 




	 




	(18




	)%






	 




	 




	$




	1,834,549




	 




	 




	 




	1,515,792




	 




	 




	$




	(318,757




	)




	 




	 




	(17




	)%







	 



	The decrease in
	operating expenses was driven by overall decreases in costs as we tried to control spending due to a lack of operating capital.


	 


	During the year
	ended December 31, 2016, interest expense increased by approximately $600,000. This increase is due to additional debt of approximately
	$2,100,000.


	 


	Other income (expense)
	consists primarily of other expenses related to conversion of debt.



	 





	Liquidity and Capital Resources



	 




	Capital Resources




	 


	We have not generated positive cash flows from operations in any year since
	our inception. Accordingly, our sources of liquidity may include potential debt and/or equity offerings. We believe that
	our principal difficulty in our inability to successfully generate positive cash flows has been the lack of available
	working capital to operate and expand our business. We believe Energie will need a minimum of approximately $2,000,000 in
	additional working capital to be utilized for a) development and launching of new products; b) funding the business
	development efforts to identify, qualify and acquire other LED lighting companies; and c) the balance for working capital,
	and general and administrative expense. While we are in discussions with various potential financing groups, other than as
	disclosed below, we have no other commitments from any investor or investment-banking firm to provide us with the necessary
	funding and there can be no assurances we will obtain such funding in the future. Failure to obtain this additional financing
	will have a material negative impact on our ability to generate profits in the future and continue operations.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	12




	 









	 








	To fund our acquisition
	plan and fund working capital for our continuing operations we will require and are continuing to seek out and discuss financing
	with potential partners or lenders. These efforts have been unsuccessful thus far and there are no assurances that they will be
	successful in the future. Failure to obtain the financing necessary will have a significant negative impact on our Company and
	our ability to remain in business. We have identified multiple potential funding sources and have diligently pursued receiving
	financing from these sources for varying lengths of time. Management believes that these efforts will be coming to a conclusion
	in the near future and will either result in significant funding for us or in no funding at all. There are no assurances that
	these pursuits will be successful and, if none of them are successful, we will not have the financial resources to continue operations
	and may require relief from bankruptcy court.


	 




	In August 2015, LG Capital
	Funding LLC, (“LG”) purchased from another debtholder all of our outstanding convertible notes and accrued interest
	payable outstanding on those convertible notes. The outstanding amount due on those convertible notes was restructured into two
	new convertible notes under a Securities Purchase Agreement, Convertible Notes and other ancillary documents. Under these agreements,
	we agreed to issue 8% convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $188,684. These notes are convertible into shares
	of our common stock at a price ranging from 58% - 65% of the lowest closing bid price of our common stock during the 15 trading
	days immediately preceding the date of conversion. The notes contain additional terms and conditions normally included in instruments
	of this kind. During the year ended December 31, 2015, LG converted $34,247 of principal and $600 of accrued interest into 21,179,939
	shares of common stock. During the year ended December 31, 2016, LG converted $82,800 of principal and $5,661 of accrued interest
	into 135,532,715 shares of common stock. Subsequent to December 31, 2016, we paid off the remaining $12,700 of principal on one
	of the notes leaving one note outstanding as of the date of this report.


	 




	Working Capital




	 


	Working capital is the amount by which current assets exceed current
	liabilities. At December 31, 2016, we had current assets, primarily cash, prepaid expenses and inventory, of $210,970, and
	current liabilities of $13,298,347, resulting in negative working capital of $13,087,377.   The increase in
	negative working capital is due to the increase in debt of approximately $2,100,000 and a resulting increase in accrued
	liabilities of approximately $780,000 associated with an increase in interest expense.


	 




	Cash Flows




	 


	At December 31, 2016,
	we had cash and cash equivalents of $5,454.


	 


	Our cash flows from operating,
	investing and financing activities were as follows:



	 








	 




	 




	Year
	ended December 31,






	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Net
	cash used in operating activities




	 




	$




	(1,260,777




	)




	 




	$




	(913,061




	)






	Net
	cash provided by financing activities




	 




	 




	1,248,244




	 




	 




	 




	887,169




	 







	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	13




	 









	 












	Net cash used in operating
	activities increased in 2016 by $347,716 compared to 2015.  We relied heavily on increased debt, accounts payable, and
	accrued liabilities to keep our operations running. We anticipate that overhead costs in current operations will increase in the
	future if we are successful in raising the capital described herein as a result of our anticipated increased marketing and
	operating activities.


	 


	During 2016, we relied
	on additional borrowings under both new and existing debt agreements. In 2016, net cash flows provided by financing activities
	were composed of $1,723,411 of additional borrowings and $475,167 of debt pay down. In 2015, we borrowed $1,421,326 of additional
	debt and paid down $534,157 of debt.


	 


	We believe that our principal
	difficulty in our inability to successfully generate profits has been the lack of available capital to operate and expand our
	business.  We believe we need a minimum of approximately $2,000,000 in additional working capital to be utilized
	for development and launching of new products for Energie. In addition, we believe we need approximately $10,000,000 to pay off
	a significant portion of our debt and to begin funding the business development efforts to identify, qualify and acquire other
	LED lighting companies, with the balance for working capital and general and administrative expense.  As of the date
	of this report, other than as disclosed below, we have no other commitment from any investor or investment-banking firm to provide
	us with the necessary funding and there can be no assurances we will obtain such funding in the future.  Failure to
	obtain this additional financing will have a material negative impact on our ability to generate profits in the future. 


	 



	Inflation



	 


	Although our operations
	are influenced by general economic conditions, we do not believe that inflation had a material effect on our results of operations
	during the year ended December 31, 2016.



	 








	Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements



	 


	We had no off-balance
	sheet arrangements as of December 31, 2016 and 2015.


	 



	Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates



	 


	The discussion and analysis
	of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance
	with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States.  The preparation of these financial statements requires
	us to make estimates and judgments that affect the amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosure
	of contingent assets and liabilities. On an on-going basis, we evaluate our estimates based on historical experience and on various
	other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments
	about the carrying values of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources.  Actual results
	may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions.  


	 


	We define critical accounting
	policies as those that are reflective of significant judgments and uncertainties and which may potentially result in materially
	different results under different assumptions and conditions.  In applying these critical accounting policies, our management
	uses its judgment to determine the appropriate assumptions to be used in making certain estimates.  These estimates are subject
	to an inherent degree of uncertainty.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	14




	 









	 










	Purchase Accounting for Acquisitions




	 


	Acquisition of a business
	requires companies to record assets acquired and liabilities assumed at their respective fair market values at the date of acquisition.
	 Any amount of the purchase price paid that is in excess of the estimated fair value of the net assets acquired is recorded
	as goodwill.  We determine fair value using widely accepted valuation techniques, primarily discounted cash flows and market
	multiple analyses.  These types of analyses require us to make assumptions and estimates regarding industry and economic
	factors, the profitability of future business strategies, discount rates and cash flow.  If actual results are not consistent
	with our assumptions and estimates, or our assumptions and estimates change due to new information, we may be exposed to an impairment
	charge in the future.


	 




	Impairment of Long-lived Assets




	 


	We periodically evaluate
	whether the carrying value of long-lived assets has been impaired when circumstances indicate the carrying value of those assets
	may not be recoverable.  The carrying amount is not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of the undiscounted cash flows expected
	to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset.  If the carrying value is not recoverable, the impairment loss
	is measured as the excess of the asset’s carrying value over its fair value.


	 


	Our impairment analyses
	require management to apply judgment in estimating future cash flows as well as asset fair values, including forecasting useful
	lives of the assets, assessing the probability of different outcomes, and selecting the discount rate that reflects the risk inherent
	in future cash flows. If the carrying value is not recoverable, we assess the fair value of long-lived assets using commonly accepted
	techniques, and may use more than one method, including, but not limited to, recent third party comparable sales and discounted
	cash flow models.  If actual results are not consistent with our assumptions and estimates, or our assumptions and estimates
	change due to new information, we may be exposed to an impairment charge in the future.


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	15




	 









	 








	Contingent Liabilities




	 


	We accrue a loss for contingencies
	if it is probable that an asset has been impaired or a liability has been incurred, and when the amount of loss can be reasonably
	estimable. When no accrual is made because one or both of these conditions does not exist, we disclose the contingency if there
	is at least a reasonable possibility that a loss may be incurred. We estimate contingent liabilities based on the best information
	we have available at the time. If we have a range of possible outcomes, we accrue the low end of the range.


	 




	Debt with Equity-linked Features




	 


	We issue debt that may
	have separate conversion features or no equity-linked attributes.


	 


	When we issue debt with
	a conversion feature, we must first assess whether the conversion feature meets the requirements to be treated as a derivative.
	 If the conversion feature within convertible debt meets the requirements to be treated as a derivative, we estimate the
	fair value of the convertible debt derivative using Black-Scholes upon the date of issuance, using the stock price on the date
	of issuance, the risk free interest rate associated with the life of the debt, and the estimated volatility of our stock.  If
	the conversion feature is not treated as a derivative, we assess whether it is a beneficial conversion feature (“BCF”).
	 A BCF exists if the conversion price of the convertible debt instrument is less than the stock price on the commitment date.
	 This typically occurs when the conversion price is less than the fair value of the stock on the date the instrument was
	issued.  The value of a BCF is equal to the intrinsic value of the feature, the difference between the conversion price and
	the common stock into which it is convertible.





	 











	ITEM 7A.






	QUANTITATIVE AND
	QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK






	 


	Not required for
	a smaller reporting company.





	 












	ITEM 8.






	FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
	AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA






	 








	Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm


	17






	Consolidated Balance Sheets


	18




	Consolidated Statements of Operations


	19




	Consolidated Statements of Equity


	20




	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows


	21




	Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements


	22











	 

	Table Of Contents







	16




	 









	 











	REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC
	ACCOUNTING FIRM




	  




	To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of ExeLED Holdings,
	Inc.:




	 



	We have audited the accompanying
	consolidated balance sheets of ExeLED Holdings, Inc. (“the Company”) as of December 31, 2016 and 2015 and the related
	statement of operations, stockholders’ equity (deficit) and cash flows for the years then ended. These financial statements
	are the responsibility of the Company's management.  Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements
	based on our audit. 


	 


	We conducted our audit
	in accordance with standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we
	plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. 
	An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements, assessing
	the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement
	presentation.  We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion. 


	 


	In our opinion, the financial
	statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of ExeLED Holdings, Inc., as of
	December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for the years then ended, in conformity with
	generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.


	 


	The company is not required
	to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting.  Our audit included consideration
	of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances,
	but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the Company's internal control over financial reporting.  Accordingly,
	we express no such opinion.


	 


	The accompanying financial
	statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going concern. As discussed in Note 1 to the financial
	statements, the Company has suffered recurring losses from operations and has a significant accumulated deficit. In addition,
	the Company continues to experience negative cash flows from operations. These factors raise substantial doubt about the Company's
	ability to continue as a going concern. Management's plans in regard to these matters are also described in Note 1. The financial
	statements do not include any adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.


	 



	 



	 



	B F Borgers CPA PC


	Lakewood, CO

	April 17, 2017


	 






	 

	Table Of Contents







	17




	 










	 











	 






	EXELED HOLDINGS, INC.




	Consolidated Balance Sheets



	 





	 




	 




	December
	31,






	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	ASSETS




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Current
	assets:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	   Cash
	and cash equivalents




	 




	$




	5,454




	 




	 




	$




	17,987




	 






	   Receivables,
	net




	 




	 




	31




	 




	 




	 




	8,551




	 






	   Inventory,
	net




	 




	 




	157,178




	 




	 




	 




	190,151




	 






	   Prepaid
	expenses and other




	 




	 




	48,307




	 




	 




	 




	52,759




	 






	Total
	current assets




	 




	 




	210,970




	 




	 




	 




	269,448




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Noncurrent
	assets:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	   Deposits




	 




	 




	6,450




	 




	 




	 




	12,345




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Total
	assets




	 




	$




	217,420




	 




	 




	$




	281,793




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	LIABILITIES
	AND EQUITY




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Current
	liabilities:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	   Accounts
	payable




	 




	$




	2,988,439




	 




	 




	$




	2,505,397




	 






	   Accrued
	liabilities




	 




	 




	1,858,127




	 




	 




	 




	1,076,040




	 






	   Debt,
	current portion, net of discount and debt issuance costs




	 




	 




	8,451,781




	 




	 




	 




	5,156,305




	 






	Total
	current liabilities




	 




	 




	13,298,347




	 




	 




	 




	8,737,742




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Debt,
	long-term portion




	 




	 




	220,000




	 




	 




	 




	1,593,003




	 






	  Total
	liabilities




	 




	 




	13,518,347




	 




	 




	 




	10,330,745




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Commitments
	and contingencies (Note 6)




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Equity:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Common
	stock, $.0001 par value; 250,000,000 shares




	authorized;
	249,447,433 and 113,914,718 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and 2015





	 




	 




	24,743




	 




	 




	 




	11,191




	 






	Additional
	paid-in capital




	 




	 




	2,635,896




	 




	 




	 




	2,446,196




	 






	Accumulated
	deficit




	 




	 




	(15,961,566




	)




	 




	 




	(12,506,339




	)






	  Total
	deficit




	 




	 




	(13,300,927




	)




	 




	 




	(10,048,952




	)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Total
	liabilities and equity




	 




	$




	217,420




	 




	 




	$




	281,793




	 







	 




	See accompanying
	notes to consolidated financial statements.







	 

	Table Of Contents







	18




	 









	 







	 







	EXELED HOLDINGS,
	INC.






	Consolidated
	Statements of Operations






	 







	 




	 




	Year
	ended December 31,






	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Revenue




	 




	$




	439,278




	 




	 




	$




	543,036




	 






	Cost
	of revenue




	 




	 




	216,949




	 




	 




	 




	328,971




	 






	   Gross
	profit




	 




	 




	222,329




	 




	 




	 




	214,065




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Operating
	expenses:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	   Research
	and development




	 




	 




	249,687




	 




	 




	 




	255,754




	 






	   Sales
	and marketing




	 




	 




	68,130




	 




	 




	 




	109,594




	 






	   General
	and administrative




	 




	 




	1,197,975




	 




	 




	 




	1,469,201




	 






	Total
	operating expenses




	 




	 




	1,515,792




	 




	 




	 




	1,834,549




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Loss
	from operations




	 




	 




	(1,293,463




	)




	 




	 




	(1,620,484




	)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Other
	income (expense):




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	   Interest
	expense




	 




	 




	(1,872,684




	)




	 




	 




	(1,273,255




	)






	   Loss
	on conversion of debt




	 




	 




	(114,793




	)




	 




	 




	(211,304




	)






	   Gain
	of forgiveness of debt




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	155,717




	 






	   Other




	 




	 




	(174,287




	)




	 




	 




	(46,300




	)






	Other
	income (expense), net




	 




	 




	(2,161,764




	)




	 




	 




	(1,375,142




	)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Net
	loss




	 




	$




	(3,455,227




	)




	 




	$




	(2,995,626




	)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Net loss per common
	share




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Basic
	and diluted




	 




	$




	(0.02




	)




	 




	$




	(0.04




	)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Weighted average
	common shares outstanding:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Basic
	and diluted




	 




	 




	176,839,038




	 




	 




	 




	74,761,927




	 








	 





	See accompanying
	notes to consolidated financial statements







	 

	Table Of Contents







	19




	 









	 















	EXELED
	HOLDINGS, INC.






	Consolidated
	Statements of Equity





	 






	 





	Common
	Stock





	 




	 




	 






	 






	 






	Number
	of






	Shares








	 






	 






	Amount








	Additional






	Paid-in






	Capital








	 






	Retained






	Deficit








	 






	 






	Total









	December
	31, 2014





	53,816,667




	$	5,182




	$	1,848,172




	$	(9,510,713)




	$	(7,657,359)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Common
	stock issued for services




	4,150,000




		415




		40,435




		--




		40,850






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Conversion
	of debt




	55,948,051




	             5,594




	        339,864




	                  --




	        345,458






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Debt
	discount




	--




		--




		217,725




		--




		217,725






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Consolidated
	net loss




	--




	                   --




	                  --




	    (2,995,626)




	   (2,995,626)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	December
	31, 2015





	113,914,718




	$	11,191




	$	2,446,196




	$	(12,506,339)




	$	(10,048,952)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Conversion
	of debt




	135,532,715




		13,552




		189,700




		--




		203,252






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Consolidated
	net loss




	--




		--




		--




		(3,455,227)




		(3,455,227)






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	December
	31, 2016





	249,447,433




	$	24,743




	$	2,635,896




	$	(15,961,566)




	$	(13,300,927)








	 





	 




	See accompanying
	notes to consolidated financial statements







	 

	Table Of Contents







	20




	 









	 















	EXELED HOLDINGS,
	INC.






	Consolidated
	Statements of Cash Flows






	 










	 






	Year
	ended December 31,








	 






	 






	2016






	 






	2015







	Operating
	Activities:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Net
	loss




	 




	$




	(3,455,227




	)




	 




	$




	(2,995,626




	)






	  Adjustments
	to reconcile net loss to net cash used in




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	    operating
	activities:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	    Amortization
	of debt issuance costs




	 




	 




	316,026




	 




	 




	 




	102,257




	 






	    Amortization
	of debt discount




	 




	 




	72,310




	 




	 




	 




	145,415




	 






	    Common
	stock issued for services




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	40,850




	 






	    Loss
	on conversion of debt




	 




	 




	114,791




	 




	 




	 




	211,304




	 






	Changes
	in operating assets and liabilities:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Accounts
	receivable




	 




	 




	8,520




	 




	 




	 




	18,786




	 






	  Inventory




	 




	 




	32,973




	 




	 




	 




	58,511




	 






	  Prepaid
	expenses




	 




	 




	10,347




	 




	 




	 




	14,882




	 






	  Accounts
	payable




	 




	 




	851,735




	 




	 




	 




	929,928




	 






	  Accrued
	liabilities




	 




	 




	787,748




	 




	 




	 




	560,632




	 






	Net
	cash used in operating activities




	 




	 




	(1,260,777




	)




	 




	 




	(913,061




	)






	Financing
	Activities:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Proceeds
	from debt




	 




	 




	1,723,411




	 




	 




	 




	1,421,326




	 






	  Payments
	of debt




	 




	 




	(475,167




	)




	 




	 




	(534,157




	)






	Net
	cash provided by financing activities




	 




	 




	1,248,244




	 




	 




	 




	887,169




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Net
	change in cash




	 




	 




	(12,533




	)




	 




	 




	(25,892




	)





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Cash, beginning
	of period




	 




	 




	17,987




	 




	 




	 




	43,879




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Cash,
	end of period




	 




	$




	5,454




	 




	 




	$




	17,987




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Cash
	paid for:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Interest




	 




	$




	692,661




	 




	 




	$




	414,743




	 






	  Income
	taxes




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Non-cash
	transactions:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Debt
	converted to common stock




	 




	$




	82,800




	 




	 




	$




	134,154




	 






	Accounts
	payable converted to debt




	 




	 




	368,693




	 




	 




	 




	653,176




	 






	Accrued
	liabilities converted to debt




	 




	 




	5,661




	 




	 




	 




	53,053




	 






	Debt
	issuance costs




	 




	 




	495,223




	 




	 




	 




	192,699




	 















	 




	See accompanying
	notes to consolidated financial statements.







	 

	Table Of Contents







	21




	 









	 








	EXELED
	HOLDINGS, INC.








	Notes to Consolidated
	Financial Statements





	 





	Note 1 – Description of
	Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies






	 






	Formation of the Company





	 




	ExeLED
	Holdings, Inc. was incorporated in the State of Delaware on October 20, 1986 under the name “Verilink Corporation.”
	We have also been known as Energie Holdings, Inc. and Alas Aviation Corp. On December 31, 2013, we entered into a Share Exchange
	Agreement (the “Share Exchange Agreement”) with OELC, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and its wholly-owned
	subsidiary, Energie LLC (hereinafter referred to as, “Energie”). The Share Exchange Agreement was not effective until
	July 2, 2014 due to a variety of conditions subsequent that needed to be met, which are described below. Upon effectiveness, we
	issued 33,000,000 “restricted” shares of our common stock, representing approximately 65% of our then issued and outstanding
	voting securities, in exchange for all of the issued and outstanding member interests of Energie. The accounting is identical
	to that resulting from a reverse acquisition, except that no goodwill or other intangible is recorded.




	 




	Thereafter,
	on January 27, 2014, we entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the “Merger Agreement”) with two of our then
	wholly owned subsidiaries, Energie Holdings, Inc. and Alas Acquisition Company. The net effect of the Merger Agreement was to
	effectuate a name change from Alas Aviation Corp., to Energie Holdings, Inc. in order to provide a better understanding to investors
	of our entry into the LED lighting industry. Our management also changed.




	 




	All
	references herein to “us,” “we,” “our,” “Holdings,” or the “Company”
	refer to ExeLED Holdings, Inc. and its subsidiaries, and their respective business following the consummation of the Merger and
	Share Exchange Agreements, unless the context otherwise requires.




	 





	Description of Business





	 




	We
	are focused on acquiring and growing specialized LED lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both
	commercial and residential applications. The lighting products include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology
	that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. Our objective
	is to grow, innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated with solid state lighting.




	 




	Energie
	was founded in 2001 and is engaged in the import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior
	design markets in North America. Our headquarters is located in Arvada, Colorado, and we also maintain a production and assembly
	facility in Zeeland, Michigan.




	 





	Basis of Presentation





	 




	Our
	financial statements are prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (“GAAP”).
	The preparation of our financial statements requires us to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
	assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Although these estimates are based on our knowledge of current events and actions
	we may undertake in the future, actual results may ultimately differ from these estimates and assumptions. Furthermore, when testing
	assets for impairment in future periods, if management uses different assumptions or if different conditions occur, impairment
	charges may result.




	 





	Going Concern





	 




	As
	shown in the accompanying financial statements, we had an equity deficit of $13,300,927 and a working capital deficit of $13,087,377
	as of December 31, 2016, and have reported net losses of $3,455,227 and $2,995,626, respectively, for the years ended December
	31, 2016 and 2015.  These factors raise substantial doubt regarding our ability to continue as a going concern. 




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	22




	 









	 











	Our
	ability to continue as a going concern is dependent on our ability to further implement our business plan, attract additional
	capital and, ultimately, upon our ability to develop future profitable operations. We intend to fund our business development,
	acquisition endeavors and operations through equity and debt financing arrangements. However, there can be no assurance that these
	arrangements will be sufficient to fund our ongoing capital expenditures, working capital, and other cash requirements. The outcome
	of these matters cannot be predicted at this time. These matters raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going
	concern. The consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that might be necessary if we are unable to continue
	as a going concern. Additionally, current economic conditions in the United States and globally create significant challenges
	attaining sufficient funding.




	 








	Some
	of our debt agreements are due on demand. If demand for payment is made by one or multiple vendors, we would experience a liquidity
	issue as we do not currently have the funds available to pay off these debts. While we have entered into extensions with several
	of our lenders, there can be no assurances that any of the lenders will be cooperative or that if they are willing to provide
	extensions or forbearances, that the terms under which they may be willing to provide them will be favorable to us.




	 





	Reclassifications






	 





	Certain
	prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform with the current year presentation.




	 





	Summary of Significant Accounting
	Policies





	 






	Cash and cash equivalents






	 




	Cash
	and cash equivalents include cash on hand, deposits with banks, and investments that are highly liquid and have maturities of
	three months or less at the date of purchase.




	 






	Accounts receivable






	 




	We
	record accounts receivable at net realizable value. This value includes an appropriate allowance for estimated uncollectible accounts
	to reflect any loss anticipated on the accounts receivable balances and is charged to Other income (expense) in the consolidated
	statements of operations. We calculate this allowance based on our history of write-offs, the level of past-due accounts based
	on the contractual terms of the receivables, and our relationships with, and the economic status of, our customers.




	 




	At
	our discretion, we may sell our accounts receivable with recourse in order to accelerate the receipt of cash. Upon the sale of
	selected accounts receivable, title transfers to the counterparty to the factoring agreement, we receive 85% of the face amount
	sold, and we remove the account receivable from our balance. We pay a commission and, if the balance is not collected by the counterparty
	within 30 days, a factoring fee. We are responsible for repaying the factoring counterparty for any amounts they are unable to
	collect. The factoring counterparty retains a reserve in the event the amount they ultimately collect is less than the amount
	paid to us. Depending on the volume of activity and uncollected accounts, therefore, we may have a receivable from or a liability
	to the factoring counterparty.




	 






	Inventory






	 




	Inventory
	is stated at the lower of cost or market, using the first-in, first-out method (“FIFO”) to determine cost. We monitor
	inventory cost compared to selling price in order to determine if a lower of cost or market reserve is necessary. We also estimate
	and maintain an inventory reserve, as needed, for such matters as obsolete inventory, shrink and scrap.




	 






	Intangible assets






	 




	Our
	intangible assets consist of the following:




	 





	UL
	Listings

	– Energie has over 20 United Laboratories

	TM

	(“UL”) files, which include UL Listings
	for over 14,000 products for sale in the United States and Canada. UL is an independent safety testing laboratory. A UL Listing
	means that UL has tested representative samples of the product and determined that it meets UL’s requirements. These requirements
	are based primarily on UL’s published and nationally recognized standards for safety. UL’s testing certifies the design,
	construction and assembly of the certified products. UL Listings do not expire as long as the product certified is not materially
	changed. Ownership of a UL Listing may also be transferred between companies. Most customers in the lighting industry will only
	buy UL listed products.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	23




	 









	 












	Trademarks

	– Energie is a registered trademark.




	 





	Marketing
	and design

	– These consist of engineering and marketing materials covering the majority of our product offerings.




	 




	Intangible
	assets are recorded at the cost to acquire the intangible, net of amortization over their estimated useful lives on a straight-line
	basis. We determine the useful lives of our intangible assets after considering the specific facts and circumstances related to
	each intangible asset. Factors we consider when determining useful lives include the contractual term of any agreement related
	to the asset, the historical performance of the asset, our long-term strategy for using the asset, any laws or other local regulations
	that could impact the useful life of the asset, and other economic factors, including competition and specific market conditions.




	 






	Property and equipment






	 




	Property
	and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation is recorded using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of our
	assets, which are reviewed periodically.




	 






	Impairment of long-lived assets






	 




	When
	facts and circumstances indicate that the carrying value of long-lived assets may not be recoverable, management assesses the
	recoverability of the carrying value by preparing estimates of revenues and the resulting gross profit and cash flows. These estimated
	future cash flows are consistent with those we use in our internal planning. If the sum of the expected future cash flows (undiscounted
	and without interest charges) is less than the carrying amount, we recognize an impairment loss. The impairment loss recognized,
	if any, is the amount by which the carrying amount of the asset (or asset group) exceeds the fair value. We may use a variety
	of methods to determine the fair value of these assets, including discounted cash flow models, which are consistent with the assumptions
	we believe hypothetical marketplace participants would use.




	 




	We
	have the option to perform a qualitative assessment of long-lived assets prior to completing the impairment test described above.
	We must assess whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of the long-lived assets is less than their carrying amount.
	If we conclude that this is the case, we must perform the test described above. Otherwise, we do not need to perform any further
	assessment.




	 




	As
	a result of applying the above procedures, we fully impaired all long-lived assets during the year ended December 31, 2014. Since
	that time, we have not acquired any long-lived assets.




	 






	Warranty reserve






	 




	We
	provide limited product warranty for one year on our products and, accordingly, accrue an estimate of the related warranty expense
	at the time of sale, included in Accrued liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets.




	 






	Convertible debt






	 




	We
	first evaluate our convertible debt to determine whether the conversion feature is an embedded derivative that requires bifurcation
	and derivative treatment. Based on our analysis, we determined derivative treatment was not required. We then evaluate whether
	the conversion feature is a beneficial conversion feature. Our convertible debt is treated as a liability and permits settlement
	in cash. Accordingly, in order to determine the value of the conversion feature, we compared the estimated fair value of the convertible
	debt to the fair value of debt that did not have the conversion feature. Based on this analysis, we concluded that the value of
	the conversion feature was immaterial.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	24




	 









	 













	Revenue recognition






	 




	We
	recognize revenue when the four revenue recognition criteria are met, as follows:




	 








	·





	Persuasive
	evidence of an arrangement exists

	– our customary practice is to obtain written
	evidence, typically in the form of a sales contract or purchase order;












	·





	Delivery

	– when custody is transferred to our customers either upon shipment to or receipt
	at our customers’ locations, with no right of return or further obligations, such
	as installation;












	·





	The
	price is fixed or determinable

	– prices are typically fixed at the time the
	order is placed and no price protections or variables are offered; and












	·





	Collectability
	is reasonably assured

	– we typically work with businesses with which we have
	a long standing relationship, as well as monitoring and evaluating customers’ ability
	to pay.







	 




	 




	Refunds
	and returns, which are minimal, are recorded as a reduction of revenue. Payments received by customers prior to our satisfying
	the above criteria are recorded as unearned income in the consolidated balance sheets.




	 






	Shipping and handling






	 




	Payments
	by customers to us for shipping and handling costs are included in revenue on the consolidated statements of operations, while
	our expense is included in cost of revenues. Shipping and handling for inventory and materials purchased by us is included as
	a component of inventory on the consolidated balance sheets, and in cost of revenues in the consolidated statements of operations
	when the product is sold.




	 






	Research and development costs






	 




	Internal
	costs related to research and development efforts on existing or potential products are expensed as incurred. External costs incurred
	for intangible assets, such as UL listing costs and attorney fees for patents, are capitalized.




	 






	Income taxes






	 




	We
	recognize deferred income tax assets and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences of temporary differences between
	the income tax and financial reporting carrying amount of our assets and liabilities. We monitor our deferred tax assets and evaluate
	the need for a valuation allowance based on the estimate of the amount of such deferred tax assets that we believe do not meet
	the more-likely-than-not recognition criteria. We also evaluate whether we have any uncertain tax positions and would record a
	reserve if we believe it is more-likely-than-not our position would not prevail with the applicable tax authorities. Our assessment
	of tax positions as of December 31, 2016 and 2015, determined that there were no material uncertain tax positions.




	 






	Concentration of credit risk






	 




	Financial
	instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist of accounts receivable and the amount due, if
	any, from our factoring counterparty. For the year ended December 31, 2016 one customer represented more than 20% of our total
	revenues. As of December 31, 2016, our accounts receivable balance was not material to the overall consolidated financial statements.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	25




	 









	 













	Fair value of financial instruments






	 




	Our
	financial instruments include cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, accounts payable, accrued liabilities, and long-term
	debt. The carrying value of these financial instruments is considered to be representative of their fair value due to the short
	maturity of these instruments. The carrying amount of our long-term debt approximates fair value, because the interest rates on
	these instruments approximate the interest rate on debt with similar terms available to us.




	 




	Fair
	value is defined as the exchange price that would be received for an asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in
	the principal or most advantageous market for the asset or liability, in an orderly transaction between market participants on
	the measurement date. Valuation techniques used to measure fair value must maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize
	the use of unobservable inputs. The fair value hierarchy is based on three levels of inputs, of which the first two are considered
	observable and the last unobservable, as follows:




	 




	Level
	1 – Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.




	 




	Level
	2 – Inputs other than Level 1 that are observable, either directly or indirectly, such as quoted prices for similar assets
	or liabilities; quoted prices in markets that are not active; or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by observable
	market data for substantially the full term of the assets or liabilities.




	 




	Level
	3 – Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no market activity and that are significant to the measurement of
	the fair value of the assets or liabilities.




	 






	Reportable segments






	 




	We
	have identified our operating segments, our chief operating decision maker (“CODM”), and the discrete financial information
	reviewed by the CODM. After evaluating this information, we have determined that we have one reportable segment.




	 





	Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements





	 




	In
	July 2015, the FASB issued ASU No. 2015-11 (ASU 2015-11), 

	Inventory (Topic 330): Simplifying the Measurement of Inventory.

	 ASU
	2015-11 more closely aligns the measurement of inventory in GAAP with the measurement of inventory in International Financial
	Reporting Standards (IFRS). As such, an entity should measure inventory that is within the scope of this ASU at the lower of cost
	and net realizable value. We do not expect the impact of the adoption of ASU 2015-11 to be material to our consolidated financial
	statements.




	 




	In
	September 2015, the FASB issued ASU No. 2015-16 (ASU 2015-16), 

	Business Combinations (Topic 805): Simplifying the Accounting
	for Measurement-Period Adjustments

	. ASU 2015-16 requires an acquirer to “recognize adjustments to provisional amounts
	that are identified during the measurement period in the reporting period in which the adjustment amounts are determined.”
	Further, the acquirer must record, in the financial statements for the same period, “the effect on earnings of changes in
	depreciation, amortization, or other income effects, if any, as a result of the change to the provisional amounts, calculated
	as if the accounting had been completed at the acquisition date.” We do not expect the impact of the adoption of ASU 2015-16
	to be material to our consolidated financial statements.




	 




	In November 2015, the FASB
	issued ASU No. 2015-17 (ASU 2015-17) ,

	Balance Sheet Classification of Deferred Taxes (Topic 740)

	. The guidance in
	this new standard eliminated the current requirement to present deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities as current
	and noncurrent in a classified balance sheet and now requires entities to classify all deferred tax assets and deferred
	tax liabilities as noncurrent. Public companies are required to apply the guidance beginning with the quarter ending March
	31, 2017. We do not expect the impact of the adoption of ASU 2015-17 to be material to our consolidated
	financial statements.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	26




	 









	 











	In
	February 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, 

	Leases (Topic 842)

	 (ASU 2016-02). ASU 2016-02 requires that lessees
	will be required to recognize assets and liabilities on the balance sheet for the rights and obligations created by all leases
	with terms of more than 12 months. ASU 2016-02 also will require disclosures designed to give financial statement users information
	on the amount, timing, and uncertainty of cash flows arising from leases. These disclosures include qualitative and quantitative
	information. For public companies, the standard will take effect for fiscal years, and interim periods within those fiscal years,
	beginning after December 15, 2018 with earlier application permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact of ASU 2016-02
	on our financial statements.




	 




	In
	March 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-09, 

	Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to Employee
	Share-Based Payment Accounting 

	(ASU 2016-09) which simplifies several aspects of accounting for share-based payment transactions
	including income tax consequences, classification of awards as either equity or liabilities, classification on the statement of
	cash flows and accounting for forfeitures. ASU 2016-09 is effective for financial statements issued for fiscal years beginning
	after December 15, 2016. We are currently evaluating the impact of ASU 2016-09 on our financial statements.




	 




	In
	April 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-10, 

	Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Identifying Performance
	Obligations and Licensing

	 (ASU 2016-10). ASU 2016-10 amends the new revenue recognition standard that it issued jointly
	with the IASB in 2014. The amendments do not change the core principles of the standard, but clarify the accounting for licenses
	of intellectual property, as well as the identification of distinct performance obligations in a contract. We are currently evaluating
	the impact of ASU 2016-10 on our financial statements.




	 




	In
	May 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-11, 

	Revenue Recognition (Topic 605) and Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Rescission
	of SEC Guidance Because of Accounting Standards Updates 2014-09 and 2014-16 Pursuant to Staff Announcements at the March 3, 2016
	EITF Meeting 

	(ASU 2016-11). ASU 2016-11 rescinds 1) certain SEC Observer comments that are codified in FASB ASC 

	Revenue
	Recognition (Topic 605)

	, and FASB ASC Topic 932, 

	Extractive Activities—Oil and Gas (Topic 932)

	, effective
	on adoption of FASB ASC 

	Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606)

	 and 2) SEC Staff Announcement, "Determining
	the Nature of a Host Contract Related to a Hybrid Instrument Issued in the Form of a Share Under Topic 815," which is codified
	in FASB ASC 

	Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815)

	. The rescinded guidance is effective on adoption of FASB ASU No. 2014-16, 

	Determining
	Whether the Host Contract in a Hybrid Financial Instrument Issued in the Form of a Share Is More Akin to Debt or Equity

	. We
	are currently evaluating the impact of ASU 2016-11 on our financial statements.




	 




	In
	May 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-12, 

	Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606): Narrow-Scope Improvements
	and Practical Expedients

	 (ASU 2016-12). ASU 2016-12 addresses issues such as collectability, contract modifications,
	completed contracts at transition, and noncash considerations as they relate to the new revenue recognition standard. We are currently
	evaluating the impact of ASU 2016-12 on our financial statements.




	 




	In
	August 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-15, 

	Statement
	of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments

	 (ASU 2016-15). Stakeholders indicated
	that there is a diversity in practice in how certain cash receipts and cash payments are presented and classified in the statement
	of cash flows. ASU 2016-15 addresses eight specific cash flow issues with the objective of reducing the existing diversity in
	practice. ASU 2016-15 is effective for annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2017, and interim periods within
	those fiscal years. Early adoption is permitted. We do not expect the impact of the adoption of ASU 2016-15 to have a significant
	impact on our statement of cash flows.




	 




	Other
	recent accounting pronouncements issued by the FASB and the SEC did not, or management believes will not, have a material impact
	on our present or future consolidated financial statements.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	27




	 









	 














	Note 2 – Receivables





	 




	Receivables consist of the following:




	 









	 






	December
	31,







	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Customer
	receivables




	 




	$




	14,432




	 




	 




	$




	21,431




	 






	Less:  Allowance
	for uncollectible accounts




	 




	 




	(14,401




	)




	 




	 




	(12,880




	)






	 




	 




	$




	31




	 




	 




	$




	8,55


	1




	 








	 








	Note 3 – Inventory





	 




	Inventory consists of the following:




	 









	 






	December
	31,







	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Raw
	materials




	 




	$




	332,612




	 




	 




	$




	348,342




	 






	Less:
	Reserve




	 




	 




	(175,434




	)




	 




	 




	(158,191




	)






	 




	 




	$




	157,178




	 




	 




	$




	190,15


	1




	 








	 








	Note 4 – Debt





	 




	Debt consists of the following:




	 






	 




	 





	December
	31,








	Description






	Note






	2016






	2015







	Line
	of credit





	A





	$	47,000




	$	47,000






	Note
	payable to distribution partner





	B





		550,000




		550,000






	Investor
	debt





	C





	371,507




		267,787






	Related
	party debt





	D





		6,719,979




		5,632,543






	Other
	notes payable





	E





	981,137




		66,786






	Cash
	draw agreements





	F





		211,076




		204,423






	Convertible
	promissory notes





	G





		71,637




		154,437






	  Total




	 




		8,952,336




		6,922,976






	Less:  unamortized
	discount and debt issuance costs




	 




		(280,555)




		(173,668)






	Debt,
	net of unamortized discount and debt issuance costs




	 




		8,671,781




		6,479,308






	Less:  current
	portion




	 




		(8,451,781)




		(5,156,305)






	Debt,
	long-term portion




	 




	$	220,000




	$	1,593,003







	 





	A
	– Line of Credit

	– We utilized this entire bank line of credit for working capital purposes. The outstanding obligation
	is due on demand, has a stated initial interest rate of 10.5% that is subject to adjustment, and is guaranteed by our majority
	shareholder/CEO. Energie and our CEO (collectively, “the defendants”) were served with a summons and complaint, wherein
	the bank brought an action to collect the amount due, including interest, costs and attorney’s fees. On April 4, 2016, the
	parties to this action entered into a settlement agreement whereby the defendants agreed to pay to Vectra Bank the sum of $59,177
	on or before April 30, 2016. This payment was not made and the bank requested and received a judgment against both defendants
	jointly and severally for $61,502 plus interest of 5.25% per annum plus 9.90% per annum on the default margin.




	 





	B

	–

	Note Payable to Distribution Partner –

	Note payable to a significant European distribution partner, entered
	into in October 2014, bearing interest at 5% payable quarterly, with principal payable monthly through September 2019.




	 





	C

	–

	Investor Debt –

	Notes payable to lenders having an ownership interest in Holdings at December 31, 2016
	and 2015. These loans are not collateralized. The following summarizes the terms and balances of the investor debt:




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	28




	 









	 














	December
	31,





	 









	2016






	2015






	Interest
	Rate







	$	87,787




	$	87,787




	24%






		50,000




		50,000




	24%






		50,000




		50,000




	24%






		25,000




		25,000




	8%






		25,000




		25,000




	8%






		20,000




		20,000




	2%






		113,720




		10,000




	various






	$	351,507




	$	267,787




	 









	 







	 






	D
	– Related Party Debt

	– The following summarizes notes payable to related parties.





	 







	 





	December
	31,





	 








	 





	2016






	2015






	Interest
	Rate







	D1




	$	4,635,865




	$	4,120,465




	various






	D2




		--




		528,214




	various






	D3




		34,888




		34,888




	12%






	D4




		356,550




		280,800




	various






	D5




		668,176




		668,176




	18%






	D6




		1,024,500




		--




	6%






	Total




	$	6,719,979




	$	5,632,543




	 








	 






	D1

	– Notes payable to Symbiote, Inc. (“Symbiote”), entered into from December 2014 to June 2016, with monthly
	principal and interest payable through November 2017. Symbiote is an owner of the common stock of Holdings, is the lessor of our
	manufacturing facility, and the provider of our payroll services. We also owe Symbiote $315,815 in accounts payable.




	 





	D2

	– Notes payable to a former executive vice president, entered into from December 2014 through December 2015, with monthly
	principal and interest payable through November 2017. As of December 31, 2016, this individual is no longer employed by Holdings
	and is no longer considered a related party.




	 





	D3

	– Note payable to our chief executive officer (“CEO”), entered into in December 2014, with monthly principal
	and interest payable through December 2016. We also owe Hal $700,391 in accrued compensation and expenses incurred on behalf of
	the Company.




	 





	D4

	– Notes payable to the spouse of our CEO, entered into from September 2013 to November 2016, with principal and interest
	payments due upon a specific event or upon demand.




	 





	D5

	 –
	Notes payable to the consulting firm that employs our Chief Financial Officer, entered into from June 2015 to December 2015. These
	notes aggregated the previous accounts payable and accrued interest due to the consulting firm at the time the notes were made.
	As of January 1, 2016, the notes are convertible into shares of our common stock at a conversion rate of 75% of the volume weighted
	average market price of our stock over the 20 days preceding the notification of conversion. We determined that this conversion
	feature does not meet the requirements to be treated as a derivative; however, we did determine it was a beneficial conversion
	feature. Accordingly, we recorded a debt discount of $217,725, which was amortized through interest expense over the life of the
	notes. We also owe NOW CFO $436,786 in accounts payable.




	 





	D6

	 –
	Notes payable to the principal shareholders of Symbiote, entered into from April to December 2016, with principal and interest
	payments due upon a specific event or upon demand.




	 





	E

	–

	Other Notes Payable –

	Represents the outstanding principal balance on four separate notes bearing interest
	at between 6% and 24% annually. In the event we receive proceeds as the beneficiary of a life insurance policy covering our majority
	shareholder/CEO, repayment of principal and interest is due on one of these notes prior to using the proceeds for any other purpose.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	29




	 









	 












	F
	– Cash draw agreements

	– Under these agreements, the lender advances us the principal balance and then automatically
	withdraws a stated amount each business day. Accordingly, there is no stated interest rate. The total remaining daily payments
	due under these arrangements was $285,131 as of December 31, 2016. The maturity dates of the agreements range from February to
	May 2017.





	 






	G

	–

	Convertible promissory notes –

	Represents the outstanding principal balance on two separate convertible
	promissory notes payable to an entity with interest of 8% annually, that were due in August 2016. During the third quarter of
	2015, the current holder of the notes purchased all of our similar outstanding convertible notes from another entity and consolidated
	those notes into two new notes. At the option of the holder, the notes may be settled in cash or converted into shares of our
	common stock at any time beginning 180 days from the date of the notes at a price equal to 61% of the average closing bid price
	of our common stock during the 10 trading days immediately preceding the date of conversion. In the event we fail to pay the notes
	when they become due, the balance due under the notes incurs interest at the rate of 22% per annum. The notes contain additional
	terms and conditions normally included in instruments of this kind, including a right of first refusal wherein we have granted
	the holders the right to match the terms of any future financing in which we engage on the same terms and contemplated in such
	future financing. We estimate that the fair value of the conversion feature is minimal, so no value has been assigned to the beneficial
	conversion feature. During the year ended December 31, 2016, $82,800 of principal and $5,661 of accrued interest was converted
	into 135,532,715 shares of common stock. We also recorded a loss on conversion of debt of $114,791 related to these transactions.
	Subsequent to December 31, 2016, we paid off the remaining $12,700 of principal on one of the notes leaving one note outstanding
	as of the date of this report.




	 




	Debt
	issuance costs of $280,555 are being amortized over the life of their respective notes.




	 




	The
	future maturities of debt are as follows:




	 







	Year
	ending December 31,





	 








	2017




	$	8,451,781






	2018




		120,000






	2019




		100,000






	 




	$	8,671,781







	 





	Note 5 – Equity





	 




	We
	have authorized 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock at $0.0001 par value, with no shares issued and outstanding as of December
	31, 2016. Upon issuing preferred stock, if any, the terms of each tranche of issuance may be determined by our board of directors,
	including dividends and voting rights.




	 




	In
	July 2014, we entered into an agreement with Dutchess Opportunity Fund, II, LP (“Dutchess”), under which Dutchess
	has agreed to purchase from us 5,000,000 shares of our common stock, up to $5 million, during a 36 month period commencing on
	the date a Registration Statement on Form S-1 was declared effective, October 29, 2014. We will sell these shares to Dutchess
	at a price equal to 94% of the lowest daily volume weighted-average price of our common stock during the five consecutive trading
	days beginning on the day we make notice to Dutchess and ending on and including the date that is four trading days after such
	notice. We have the right to withdraw all or any portion of any put before the closing, subject to certain limitations. As part
	of the agreement with Dutchess, we transferred 2,000,000 shares of our common stock for no proceeds. We will receive proceeds
	when we make notice to Dutchess to sell these shares. The market price of the 2,000,000 shares was $40,000, based on the trading
	price on the date of transfer. If we do not make notice to Dutchess, these shares will be returned to us at the end of the 36
	month contractual period. As of December 31, 2016, we had not made notice to Dutchess to sell any of these shares. Accordingly,
	the net impact to our stockholders equity is zero.





	 








	Note 6 – Commitments
	and Contingencies





	 




	Future
	minimum rental payments required under all leases that have remaining non-cancelable lease terms in excess of one year as of December
	31, 2016, are as follows:




	 






	2017




	$	82,145






	2018




		28,890






	 




	$	111,035







	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	30




	 









	 














	Note 7 – Income Taxes





	 




	The
	components of the provision for income taxes are as follows:





	 










	 






	Year
	ended December 31,








	 






	 






	2016






	 






	2015







	Current
	tax provision




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Federal




	 




	$




	(1,100,820




	)




	 




	$




	(941,497




	)






	  State




	 




	 




	(143,630




	)




	 




	 




	(122,690




	)






	 




	 




	 




	(1,244,450




	)




	 




	 




	(1,064,187




	)






	Deferred
	tax provision




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Federal




	 




	 




	1,100,820




	 




	 




	 




	941,497




	 






	  State




	 




	 




	143,630




	 




	 




	 




	122,690




	 






	 




	 




	 




	1,244,450




	 




	 




	 




	1,064,187




	 






	 




	 




	$




	—  




	 




	 




	$




	—  




	 







	 




	The
	components of net deferred tax assets and liabilities are as follows:




	 











	 






	Year
	ended December 31,







	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Current
	deferred tax asset (liability):




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Inventory
	reserve




	 




	$




	67,430




	 




	 




	$




	60,794




	 






	  Warranty
	reserve




	 




	 




	7,148




	 




	 




	 




	7,148




	 






	  Net
	operating loss carryforward




	 




	 




	3,185,120




	 




	 




	 




	1,940,670




	 






	  Valuation
	allowance




	 




	 




	(3,259,698




	)




	 




	 




	(2,008,612




	)






	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	Long-term
	deferred tax asset (liability)




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	  Long-lived
	assets




	 




	 




	112,895




	 




	 




	 




	124,515




	 






	  Valuation
	allowance




	 




	 




	(112,895




	)




	 




	 




	(124,515




	)






	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	Net
	deferred tax asset (liability)




	 




	$




	—  




	 




	 




	$




	—  




	 







	 




	A
	reconciliation of our income tax provision and the amounts computed by applying statutory rates to income before income taxes
	is as follows:




	 











	 






	Year
	ended December 31,







	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Income
	tax benefit at statutory rate




	 




	$




	(1,169,297




	)




	 




	$




	(1,018,511




	)






	State
	income tax, net of Federal benefit




	 




	 




	(105,092




	)




	 




	 




	(91,540




	)






	Amortization
	of debt discount




	 




	 




	27,793




	 




	 




	 




	55,884




	 






	Other




	 




	 




	7,130




	 




	 




	 




	6,765




	 






	Valuation
	allowance




	 




	 




	1,239,466




	 




	 




	 




	1,047,402




	 






	 




	 




	$




	—  




	 




	 




	$




	—  




	 







	 





	Note 8 – Net Loss Per Share





	 




	Basic
	net loss per share is computed by dividing net income by the weighted-average number of common shares outstanding during the reporting
	period. Diluted net loss per share is computed similarly to basic net loss per share, except that it includes the potential dilution
	that could occur if dilutive securities are exercised. In a net loss position, however, potential securities are excluded, because
	they are considered anti-dilutive. Since Energie, the “predecessor company,” was an LLC, it did not have common shares
	outstanding prior to the Share Exchange on July 2, 2014. Accordingly, we have prepared the calculation of Net Loss Per Share using
	the weighted-average number of common shares of Holdings that were outstanding during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	31




	 









	 











	The
	following table presents a reconciliation of the denominators used in the computation of net loss per share – basic and
	diluted:




	 










	 





	Year
	ended December 31,







	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	Net
	loss available for stockholders




	 




	$




	(3,455,227




	)




	 




	$




	(2,995,626




	)






	Weighted
	average outstanding shares of

	common stock




	 




	 




	176,839,038




	 




	 




	 




	74,761,927




	 






	Dilutive
	effect of securities




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	Common
	stock and equivalents




	 




	 




	176,839,038




	 




	 




	 




	74,761,927




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Net
	loss per share – Basic and diluted




	 




	$




	(0.02




	)




	 




	$




	(0.04




	)







	 




	There
	are no dilutive instruments outstanding during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015.





	 


















	ITEM 9.






	CHANGES
	IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE










	 




	None





	 











	ITEM 9A.






	CONTROLS
	AND PROCEDURES








	 






	Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures





	 




	We maintain disclosure controls and procedures (as defined
	in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Exchange Act) that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed
	in our reports filed under the Exchange Act, is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified
	in the Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to
	our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding
	required disclosure.




	 




	We carried out an evaluation under the supervision and
	with the participation of management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness
	of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2016, the end of the period covered by
	this Report.  Based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure
	controls and procedures were not effective at the reasonable assurance level due to the material weaknesses discussed below.




	 





	Internal Control over Financial Reporting





	 




	Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining
	adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) promulgated under the Exchange
	Act as a process designed by, or under the supervision of, our principal executive officer and principal financial officer and
	effected by the Board, management, and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
	reporting and the preparation of financial statements for

	external purposes
	in accordance with GAAP and includes those policies and procedures that:





	 








	·




	pertain
	to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect
	the transactions and dispositions of our assets;










	·




	provide
	reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation
	of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles,
	and that our receipts and expenditures of are being made only in accordance with authorizations
	of our management and directors; and










	·




	provide
	reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition,
	use, or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial
	statements.






	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	32




	 









	 











	Because of our inherent limitations, our internal control
	over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Therefore, even those systems determined to be effective can
	provide only reasonable assurance with respect to financial statement preparation and presentation. Projections of any evaluation
	of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions,
	or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.




	 








	The material weaknesses in internal control over financial
	reporting were as follows: (a) we have limited entity-level controls, because of the time constraints for our management team;
	(b) we have a lack of segregation of duties due to limited personnel; (c) we have not implemented adequate system-based and manual
	controls; and (d) we do not have an audit committee.




	 




	Our management assessed the effectiveness of internal
	control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2016.  In making this assessment, management used the criteria set forth
	by the Committee of Sponsoring Organization of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”) in Internal Control – Integrated
	Framework (2013).  Based on management’s assessment, management concluded that the above material weaknesses have not
	been remediated and, accordingly, our internal control over financial reporting is not effective as of December 31, 2016.




	 









	Remediation Plan





	 




	We have engaged consultants to evaluate our processes
	and procedures, and to implement, document and test additional internal controls. We can provide no assurance, however, that our
	internal controls over financial reporting will be effective in the near future.




	 





	Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting





	 




	There were no significant changes to our internal control
	over financial reporting that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2016, that have materially affected or are reasonably
	likely to materially affect our internal control over financial reporting.






	 






	This Annual Report on Form 10-K does not include an attestation
	report of our registered public accounting firm regarding internal control over financial reporting. Management’s report
	was not subject to attestation by our registered public accounting firm pursuant to rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission
	that permit us to provide only management’s report in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.





	 











	ITEM 9B.






	OTHER
	INFORMATION







	 




	None.




	 









	 

	Table Of Contents







	33




	 











	 










	PART III





	 











	ITEM 10.






	DIRECTORS,
	EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE







	 




	Following is a list of our officers and directors:




	 







	Name






	Age






	Position







	Harold
	Hansen




	68




	President,
	Chief Executive Officer and Director






	Richard
	Cole Dennard




	38




	Chief
	Financial Officer






	Thomas
	H. Rockers




	69




	Corporate
	Secretary






	 




	Our directors serve as directors until our next Annual
	Meeting of Stockholders and the election and qualification of the director’s respective successor or until the director’s
	earlier death, removal or resignation.




	 




	There are no family relationships between any of our former
	or current officers and directors.




	 




	Following is biographical information of our current management:





	 






	Harold (Hal) Hansen

	: President, Chief Executive
	Officer and Director. Mr. Hansen was appointed to his positions in April 2014. Since September 2011, he has also been the founder,
	CEO and Managing Member of Énergie. He has held senior executive-level positions in general management, marketing, sales
	management, and in product, market, and corporate development for major U. S. companies. Mr. Hansen has experience in international
	business projects in Canada, Mexico, Western Europe, and in the People's Republic of China. He has a broad background in the development
	and implementation of strategic and tactical marketing and business plans as well as in the development and delivery of the education,
	training, and communication programs needed to implement the plans. As a business consultant since 1983, he helped companies (ranging
	from divisions of large multi-national manufacturers and service organizations to start-ups) increase their sales volume and profitability.
	Along with a consulting engagement with Peerless Lighting, he has developed international lighting importing projects for Zumtobel/Staff
	and ERCO before becoming the temporary Vice President of Marketing and Sales for Focal Point Lighting. During these projects,
	he designed and implemented programs that established and implemented new or expanded entries of international lighting into the
	US market. Mr. Hansen devotes substantially all of his time to our affairs. Mr. Hansen’s experience as Energie’s founder
	qualifies him to serve on our board of directors.




	 





	Richard Cole Dennard

	: Chief Financial Officer.
	Mr. Dennard acts as our Chief Financial Officer on a contract basis since July 2014. He has worked with Énergie, LLC since
	early 2012. He is a seasoned accounting and finance professional with a diverse background in a variety of industries, including
	companies in the manufacturing, distribution, energy services, insurance and professional services industries. Mr. Dennard worked
	in the assurance practice at Deloitte & Touche LLP for seven years. For the last 7 years, Mr. Dennard has been a partner for
	a regional consulting firm. He devotes only such time as necessary to our business, which does not exceed 20% of his business
	activities.




	 





	Thomas H. Rockers

	: Corporate Secretary. Mr. Rockers
	was appointed as our Corporate Secretary in March 2015. Prior to his appointment, from 2003 through July 2012, when he retired,
	Mr. Rockers was the Chief Executive Officer of St. Anthony’s Medical Center, in St. Louis, MO, where he increased net revenues
	from $300 million, to $500 million. Mr. Rockers was also CEO of the Alliance in Denver, CO from 1998 to 2002, where he grew that
	company from $5 million to $40 million. Mr. Rockers received a Master of Health Care Administration from the University of Minnesota
	in 1972 and a Bachelor of Science degree from South Dakota State University in 1969. He devotes only such time as necessary to
	our business affairs, which is not expected to exceed 20% of his time.




	 





	Business Advisory Group:






	 





	Our Business Advisory Group is made up of selected professionals
	who will provide strategic and operational guidance to our executive team as well as the executives and managers of our subsidiaries.
	They are not employees, but will be contracted to perform specific projects as needed. We expect to utilize the expertise of this
	group in the event that we are able to secure external financing as discussed in “Part II, Item 7, Management’s Discussion
	and Analysis – Liquidity and Capital Resources”.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	34




	 









	 












	Philip Mercorella (72)

	Mr. Mercorella has extensive
	experience in public and private companies as well as with private equity firms. He served for 22 years with Herman Miller Inc.,
	and is now retired from that company. His positions ranged from Executive Vice- President, Herman Miller, Inc. (Parent Company)
	to being an Officer and Chief Executive of several subsidiaries. Mr. Mercorella’s private equity/operating partner involvements
	include Goldner, Hawn, Johnson & Morrison, Minneapolis, MN; Parallel Investment Partners, Dallas, TX; Genuity Capital Partners,
	Toronto, Canada; and Nicollet Capital Investors, Minneapolis, MN. He is currently serving as Chairman of the Board of Directors
	and operating partner with Flower Group Inc. (One Floral), Ontario, Canada. He holds degrees from St. Francis College, BBA Management
	and Pennsylvania State University, MBA Marketing. He has also been a faculty member at Penn State.




	 









	Andrew Hurry (48)

	Mr. Hurry is a senior banker
	with over 20 years of strategic advisory and transactional experience. His strengths include applying a unique combination of
	a pragmatic scientific, engineering and finance background to complex situations across environmental, telecom, healthcare and
	other industries. Mr. Hurry is currently a FINRA Registered Representative with the Denver based investment bank The Yale Group.
	Prior to joining The Yale Group, Mr. Hurry was a principal at Grayson & Associates, a merchant banking firm focusing on medical
	related technology investments. Before Grayson, he was a Senior Project Manager in Europe for global environmental consulting
	firms with his role focusing on business development, environmental due diligence and natural resource development. Mr. Hurry
	holds an MBA from the University of London, England, an M.Sc. from University College London and a B.Sc. from the University of
	Glasgow, Scotland.




	 





	Mitchell Kohn (62)

	Mr. Kohn is president of Mitchell
	B. Kohn Lighting Design, with Chicago area offices in Highland Park, Illinois, specializing in lighting design for corporate,
	commercial, institutional, and high-end residential environments. With over 30 years of experience, he has successfully completed
	over 500 projects throughout the world. In addition to consulting to corporations and architectural and design firms world-wide,
	Mr. Kohn is a frequent lecturer on various lighting subjects with courses registered with both the AIA and IIDA. He has been a
	consultant to several domestic and international lighting manufacturing companies, applying his expertise to product development
	and marketing. He has been published extensively on both technical subjects, as well as design projects, that have included discussions
	on glare control, energy saving techniques, task lighting, sustainability, and visual performance. He has been named a Fellow
	of both the International Association of Lighting Designers (IALD), and the Illuminating Engineering Society (IES), for which
	he served as Chairman of their Office Lighting Committee, responsible for developing and maintaining ANSI lighting standards for
	15 years. He has served on the Board of Directors of the IALD, the IALD Education Trust, the National Council on Qualifications
	for the Lighting Professions (NCQLP), and Lightfair International. For his architectural lighting designs, Mr. Kohn has also been
	the recipient of the International Illumination Design Award of Distinction, and the IES Award of Excellence, their highest design
	award recognition, a General Electric Edison Award, an IALD Design Citation, and a U.S. Patent for developments in the field of
	task lighting. He also served as writer and editor of Lighting Focus, a quarterly lighting supplement to Interiors Magazine and
	Architecture Magazine.




	 




	There are no agreements or understandings for any of our
	executive officers or directors to resign at the request of another person and no officer or director is acting on behalf of nor
	will any of them act at the direction of any other person. The offices of President, Chief Executive Officer, Treasurer, Chief
	Financial Officer and Secretary are appointed by our Board of Directors, with other officer’s positions being filled by
	appointment from our President and Chief Executive Officer. Directors are elected by our shareholders. Vacancies on the Board
	of Directors may be filled by majority vote from the remaining members of the Board of Directors or by a majority vote of our
	shareholders; in each case directors serve until their earlier resignation or their successors are duly elected and qualified.




	 





	Director Independence





	 




	We are not an issuer whose securities are listed on a
	national securities exchange, or an inter-dealer quotation system, which has requirements that a majority of the board of directors
	be independent. Under NASDAQ Rule 5605(a)(2)(A), a director is not considered to be independent if he or she also is an executive
	officer or employee of the corporation. Under such definition, Harold Hansen, our sole director, would not be considered independent.





	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	35




	 









	 














	Board Committees





	 




	We presently do not have an audit committee, compensation
	committee or nominating committee, or committees performing similar functions, as our management believes that until this point
	it has been premature at the early stage of our management and business development to form committees. However, our new management
	plans to form an audit, compensation and nominating committee in the near future; the implementation of which is likely to be
	in connection with our next contemplated acquisition. We envision that the audit committee will be primarily responsible for reviewing
	the services performed by our independent auditors and evaluating our accounting policies and system of internal controls. We
	envision that the compensation committee will be primarily responsible for reviewing and approving our salary and benefits policies
	(including stock options) and other compensation of our executive officers. The nominating committee would be primarily responsible
	for nominating directors and setting policies and procedures for the nomination of directors. The nominating committee would also
	be responsible for overseeing the creation and implementation of our corporate governance policies and procedures. Until these
	committees are established, these decisions will continue to be made by our board. Although our board has not established any
	minimum qualifications for director candidates, when considering potential director candidates, our board considers the candidate’s
	character, judgment, skills.




	 








	We do not have a charter governing the nominating process.
	Our sole director will initially perform the functions of a nominating committee, but is not independent because he is also an
	officer. There has not been any defined policy or procedure requirements for stockholders to submit recommendations or nominations
	for directors. Our Board does not believe that a defined policy with regard to the consideration of candidates recommended by
	stockholders is necessary at this time because, given the early stages of our development, a specific nominating policy would
	be premature and of little assistance until our business operations are at a more advanced level.




	 





	Section 16(a) Beneficial
	Ownership Reporting Compliance





	 




	Section 16(a) of the Exchange Act requires our officers
	and directors and persons owning more than ten percent of the common stock, to file initial reports of ownership and changes in
	ownership with the SEC. Additionally, Item 405 of Regulation S-K under the Exchange Act requires us to identify in our Form
	10-K and proxy statement those individuals for whom one of the above referenced reports was not filed on a timely basis during
	the most recent year or prior years. To our knowledge, based solely upon our review of the copies of such reports furnished to
	us, during the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, all Section 16(a) filing requirements applicable to our officers, directors
	and greater than 10% beneficial owners were complied with.




	 





	Code of Ethics





	 




	Our board of directors has not adopted a code of ethics
	but plans to do so in the near future.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	36




	 










	 


















	ITEM 11.






	EXECUTIVE
	COMPENSATION







	 




	The following table provides certain information regarding
	compensation awarded to, earned by or paid to persons serving as our Chief Executive Officer during the years ended December 31,
	2016 and 2015. We had no other highly compensated officers or employees who had total compensation exceeding $100,000 for the
	year ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 (each a “named executive officer”).




	 







	Summary
	Compensation Table





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	Salary





	 




	 





	Bonus





	 




	 





	Option
	Awards





	 




	 





	All
	Other Compensation





	 




	 





	Total





	 







	Name
	and Principal Position





	 





	Year





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 








	Harold
	(Hal) Hansen

	 

	(1)





	President,
	Chief Executive Officer and Director





	 




	 





	2015




	2016





	 




	 




	 





	150,000




	150,000





	 




	 




	 





	75,000




	75,000





	 




	 




	 





	-




	-





	 




	 




	 





	-




	-





	 




	 




	 





	 




	225,000




	225,000





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	(1) This compensation has been accrued and remains unpaid
	as of the date of this Report.





	 






	Employment Agreements





	 




	Prior to the closing of the Share Exchange and in
	anticipation of closing, we entered into an employment agreement with Harold Hansen, our President and Chief Executive
	Officer.




	 




	Mr. Hansen’s current employment agreement became
	effective April 1, 2014 and is for a term of three years. The agreement provides for an annual salary of $150,000 per year with
	increases each year if trailing twelve-month sales meet or exceed certain levels. Mr. Hansen is subject to 18 month non-compete
	/ non-solicitation provisions following termination of his employment with us. In addition, he is eligible to receive a three-year
	severance package equal to his current compensation at the time of termination in the event of a termination without cause, as
	defined therein.




	 




	We have entered into an independent contractor agreement
	with NOW CFO, a Denver, Colorado-based financial consulting firm, to provide our Treasurer and Chief Financial Officer, Richard
	Cole Dennard. The charges for these services are payable to NOW CFO, the firm that employs Mr. Dennard.  We do not pay Mr.
	Dennard directly and are not directly involved with his compensation as this is agreed to between NOW CFO and Mr. Dennard. 
	For the year ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively, we incurred $379,695 and $217,053 for services provided by NOW CFO,
	which include Mr. Dennard’s services as well as several other accounting positions.  We paid a total of $7,500 and
	$0 to NOW CFO during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively. See “Part III, Item 13. Certain Relationships
	and Related Party Transactions and Director Independence” for amounts owed to NOW CFO as of December 31, 2016 and 2015.





	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	37




	 









	 














	Equity Compensation Plan





	 




	We have adopted the Energie Holdings, Inc. 2014 Stock
	Option Plan and have reserved 5,100,000 shares of issuance thereunder (the “Plan”). The Plan includes awards that
	qualify as performance-based compensation that is exempt from the deduction limitation set forth under Section 162(m) of the Internal
	Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Code”). Subject to certain exceptions, Section 162(m) generally limits the
	corporate income tax deductions to $1,000,000 annually for compensation paid to each of the Chief Executive Officer and our other
	six highest paid executive officers required to be reported under the proxy disclosure rules.




	 




	As of the date of this report no shares or options to
	purchase any shares have been granted. We believe that the Plan will be an important factor in attracting, retaining and motivating
	our employees, consultants, agents, and directors. We believe that we need the flexibility both to have an ongoing reserve of
	common stock available for future equity-based awards, and to make future awards in a variety of forms. 




	 





	Outstanding Equity Awards at Fiscal Year-End





	 




	None.




	 





	Director Compensation





	 




	We did not pay any compensation to directors for service
	on the board of directors during the year ended December 31, 2016.





	 











	ITEM 12.






	SECURITY
	OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS







	 




	The following table sets forth certain information regarding
	the ownership of common stock as of the date of this Report, by (i) each person known to us to own more than 5% of our outstanding
	common stock as of the date of this Report, (ii) each of our directors, (iii) each of our executive officers, and (iv) all of
	our directors and executive officers as a group. Unless otherwise indicated, all shares are owned directly and the indicated person
	has sole voting and investment power.




	 









	Title
	of Class





	 






	Name
	and Address






	Of
	Beneficial Owner






	 






	Amount
	and Nature






	Of
	Beneficial Ownership






	 






	Percent






	Of
	Class








	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Common




	 





	Harold
	Hanson

	(1)





	5310
	Ward Road




	Suite
	106




	Arvada,
	CO 80002





	 




	11,696,631




	 




	4.69%






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Common




	 





	All
	Officers and Directors




	as
	a Group (1 person)





	 




	 11,696,631




	 




	4.69%






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	——————— 








	(1)




	Officer
	and/or director of our Company.







	 











	ITEM 13.






	CERTAIN
	RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE







	 





	Related Party Transactions






	 





	The following includes a summary of transactions since
	the beginning of our 2015 fiscal year, or any currently proposed transaction, in which we were or are to be a participant and
	the amount involved exceeded or exceeds the lesser of $120,000 or one percent of the average of our total assets at year end for
	the last two completed fiscal years, and in which any related person had or will have a direct or indirect material interest (other
	than compensation described under “Executive Compensation”). We believe the terms obtained or consideration that we
	paid or received, as applicable, in connection with the transactions described below were comparable to terms available or the
	amounts that would be paid or received, as applicable, in arm’s-length transactions.





	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	38




	 









	 
















	Notes Payable to Related Parties





	 




	The following summarizes the terms and balances of the
	related party notes:






	 






	 





	December
	31, 2016






	December
	31, 2015






	Interest
	Rate







	D1




	$	4,635,865	




	$             4,120,465




	various






	D2




		--




	                  528,214




	various






	D3




		34,888




	                    34,888




	12%






	D4




		356,550




	                  280,800




	various






	D5




		668,176




		668,176




	18%






	D6




		1,024,500




		--




	6%






	Total




	$	6,719,979




	$	5,632,543




	 







	 




	 




	D1 – Symbiote, Inc. is one of our shareholders.
	We also incur approximately $150,000 annually for rent expense with them. According to one of the note agreements with them, the
	note holder may, at its option at any time after default, proceed to convert any remaining balance of the notes to equity at a
	rate equal to the proportion of the remaining balance of the note divided by $4,000,000 enterprise value. This note was considered
	to be in default as of December 31, 2016; therefore, the note holder has the right to exercise the conversion option, but has
	not yet elected to do so. We evaluated this agreement for derivatives and determined that it does not qualify for derivative treatment
	for financial reporting purposes, because the agreement relates to our own equity and, the debt and the equity are not closely
	related. We also determined this does not qualify as a beneficial conversion feature. Accordingly, the balance is reported at
	the carrying amount. In addition, we entered into several additional notes with Symbiote between February 2015 and June 2016 which
	are included in this amount. We also owe Symbiote $315,815 in accounts payable.




	 




	D2 – Joe Durzo is a shareholder and former
	employee. He is no longer considered a related party.




	 




	D3 – Harold (Hal) Hansen is our chief executive
	officer (“CEO”). We also owe Hal $700,391 in accrued compensation and expense incurred on behalf of the company.




	 




	D4 – Julianne Larsen is the spouse of our CEO. This
	debt is held by a trust for which Ms. Larsen is the trustee.




	 




	D5 – NOW CFO is the consulting firm that employs
	our Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”). We also owe NOW CFO $436,786 in accounts payable.




	 




	D6 – Travis and Sandra Randolph are the principal
	shareholders of Symbiote, Inc.




	 




	There are no other related party transactions that are
	required to be disclosed pursuant to Regulation S-K promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.





	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	39




	 










	 




















	ITEM
	14.






	PRINCIPAL
	ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES








	 








	Fees Paid to Independent
	Registered Public Accounting Firms





	 




	The following table presents fees for professional audit
	services rendered by B F Borgers CPA PC, our independent accountant, during our fiscal years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015:




	 






	 




	 




	December
	31, 2016




	 




	December
	31, 2015






	Audit fees




	 




	$




	34,119




	 




	 




	$




	32,900




	 






	Audit related fees




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	Tax fees




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	All other fees




	 




	 




	—  




	 




	 




	 




	—  




	 






	Total




	 




	$




	34,119




	 




	 




	$




	32,900




	 







	 





	Audit Fees

	: Consists of amounts billed for professional
	services rendered for the audit of our annual financial statements included in our Annual Reports on Forms 10-K for our fiscal
	years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 and reviews of our interim financial statements included in our Quarterly Reports on Form
	10-Q.




	 





	Tax Fees:

	Consists of amounts billed for professional
	services rendered for tax return preparation, tax planning and tax advice.




	 





	All Other Fees

	: Consists of amounts billed for
	services other than those noted above.




	 




	We do not have an audit committee and as a result our
	entire board of directors performs the duties of an audit committee. Our board of directors evaluates the scope and cost of the
	engagement of an auditor before the auditor renders audit and non-audit services.




	 




	 









	 

	Table Of Contents







	40




	 











	 










	PART IV





	 











	ITEM 15.






	EXHIBITS,
	FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES








	 





	The following exhibits are included herewith:




	 










	Exhibit
	No.






	 






	Description








	 




	 




	 






	21.1




	 






	List of Subsidiaries





	 







	31.1




	 





	Certification of Principal Executive Officer Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002







	 




	 




	 






	31.2




	 





	Certification of Principal Financial Officer Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002







	 




	 




	 






	32.1




	 






	Certification of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002





	 







	101.INS




	 




	XBRL
	Instance Document*






	 




	 




	 






	101.SCH




	 




	XBRL
	Taxonomy Extension Schema*






	 




	 




	 






	101.CAL




	 




	XBRL
	Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase*






	 




	 




	 






	101.DEF




	 




	XBRL
	Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase*






	 




	 




	 






	101.LAB




	 




	XBRL
	Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase*






	 




	 




	 






	101.PRE




	 




	XBRL
	Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase*







	 




	 




	 






	(*)  Filed
	Herewith




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	The following exhibits have previously been filed with
	the Securities and Exchange Commission by the Registrant on the dates indicated.




	 







	 

	Table Of Contents







	41




	 









	 

















	Exhibit






	Number






	 





	Description





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	2.1




	–




	Stock
	Purchase Agreement by and between the Registrant and The Kennedy Company, dated as of February 5, 2004 (incorporated by reference
	to Exhibit 2.1 to our Current Report on Form 8-K dated as of February 20, 2004)




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	2.2




	–




	Agreement
	and Plan of Merger by and between the Registrant, SRI Acquisition Corp. and Larscom Incorporated, dated as of April 28, 2004
	(incorporated by reference to Annex A to the Joint Proxy Statement/Prospectus, dated June 24, 2004, forming a part of Verilink’s
	Registration Statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-116472)




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	3.1




	–




	Certificate
	of Incorporation of Energie Holdings, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Current Reports on Form 8-K dated as of June 10,
	2014 and July 2, 2014)




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	3.2




	–




	Bylaws
	of Energie Holdings, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Current Reports on Form 8-K dated as of June 10, 2014 and July 2,
	2014)




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	3.3




	–




	Certificate
	of Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation of Energie Holdings, Inc. filed September 18, 2014




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	3.4




	–




	Articles
	of Amendment of ExeLED Holdings Inc. filed December 4, 2015




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	10.38




	 




	–




	Share
	Exchange Agreement dated December 31, 2013 between Alas Aviation Corp. and OELC LLC, and Shareholders of OELC LLC (incorporated
	by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to our Current Report on Form 8-K dated as of December 31, 2013)






	 




	 




	 




	 






	10.39




	 




	–




	Agreement
	and Plan of Merger dated January 27, 2014 between Alas Aviation Corp., Alas Acquisition Company and Energie Holdings, Inc.
	(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to our Current Report on Form 8-K and Form 8-K/A dated as of January 27, 2014)






	 




	 




	 




	 






	10.40




	 




	–




	Investment
	Agreement dated July 16, 2014 between Energie Holdings, Inc. and Dutchess Opportunity Fund, II, LP (incorporated by reference
	to Exhibit 10.1 to our Current Report on Form 8-K dated as of July 16, 2014)






	 




	 




	 




	 






	10.41




	 




	–




	Registration
	Rights Agreement dated July 16, 2014 between Energie Holdings, Inc. and Dutchess Opportunity Fund, II, LP (incorporated by
	reference to Exhibit 10.2 to our Current Report on Form 8-K dated as of July 16, 2014)








	 








	 

	Table Of Contents







	42




	 











	 










	SIGNATURES





	 




	Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of
	the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned
	thereunder duly authorized.




	 






	Dated:  April
	17, 2017






	EXELED
	HOLDINGS INC.






	 





	By:
	__

	/s/ Harold Hansen

	________       




	Harold
	Hansen, Principal Executive Officer







	 




	 






	 





	By:
	__

	/s/ Richard Cole Dennard

	__      




	Richard
	Cole Dennard, Principal Financial and Accounting Officer







	 




	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange
	Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated
	on April 17, 2017.




	 




	__

	/s/ Harold Hansen

	________




	Harold Hansen,




	Chief Executive Officer and Director




	(principal executive officer)




	 




	__

	/s/ Richard Cole Dennard

	__




	Richard Cole Dennard, Chief Financial Officer (principal
	financial and accounting officer)









	 

	Table Of Contents







	43




	 








	 












	Exhibit 21.1



	 



	LIST OF SUBSIDIARIES



	 


	Set forth below
	is a list of each of the subsidiaries of ExeLED Holdings Inc.



	 







	Name
	of entity





	 





	Jurisdiction





	 






	Energie
	LLC




	 




	Delaware



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 












	 










	 







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 



	 











	Exhibit 31.1



	 





	CERTIFICATION



	 


	I, Harold Hansen, certify that:


	 


	1. I have
	reviewed this Annual Report on Form 10-K of ExeLED Holdings Inc.;


	 


	2. Based on
	my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary
	to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect
	to the period covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on
	my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material
	respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented
	in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant’s
	other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined
	in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act
	Rule 13a-15 (f) and 15 (d)-15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	a) designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	b) designed
	such internal control over financing reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under
	our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	c) evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about
	the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such
	evaluation; and


	 


	d) disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s
	most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially
	affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect the registrant’s internal control over the financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant’s
	other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting,
	to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or persons performing
	the equivalent functions):


	 


	a) all
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and


	 


	b) any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s
	internal control over financial reporting.



	 






	 




	/s/
	Harold Hansen






	 





	Chief
	Executive Officer







	 




	(Principal
	Executive Officer)





	 


	Date: April 17, 2017









	 








	 






	 








	 



	Exhibit 31.2



	 





	CERTIFICATION



	 


	I, Richard Cole Dennard, certify that:


	 


	1. I have
	reviewed this Annual Report on Form 10-K of ExeLED Holdings Inc.;


	 


	2. Based on
	my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary
	to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect
	to the period covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on
	my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material
	respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented
	in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant’s
	other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined
	in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act
	Rule 13a-15 (f) and 15 (d)-15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	a) designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	b) designed
	such internal control over financing reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under
	our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	c) evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about
	the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such
	evaluation; and


	 


	d) disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s
	most recent fiscal quarter (the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially
	affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect the registrant’s internal control over the financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant’s
	other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting,
	to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (or persons performing
	the equivalent functions):


	 


	a) all
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and


	 


	b) any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s
	internal control over financial reporting.



	 






	 




	/s/
	Richard Cole Dennard






	 





	Chief
	Financial Officer







	 




	(Principal
	Financial Officer)





	 


	Date: April 17, 2017









	 








	 

















	Exhibit 32.1




	 






	Certification




	Pursuant to Section 906 of the
	Sarbanes-Oxley Act Of 2002




	(Subsections (A) And (B) Of
	Section 1350, Chapter 63 of Title 18, United States Code)



	 


	Pursuant to Section 906
	of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (subsections (a) and (b) of section 1350, chapter 63 of title 18, United
	States Code), each of the undersigned officers of ExeLED Holdings Inc. (the “Company”), does hereby certify, that:


	 


	The Annual Report
	on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016 (the “Form 10-K”) of the Company fully complies
	with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and the information contained in
	the Form 10-K fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.



	 






	 




	/s/
	Harold Hansen






	 Dated: April
	17, 2017





	Chief
	Executive Officer







	 




	 (Principal
	Executive Officer)






	 




	 






	 




	 






	 




	 






	 




	/s/
	Richard Cole Dennard






	 Dated: April
	17, 2017






	Chief
	Financial Officer





	(Principal
	Financial Officer)






	 


	 











	 








	 






	 











10-Q: ENERGIE HOLDINGS, INC. - MarketWatch


























































Latest News










Dow

21,794
-2.92
-0.01%






Nasdaq

6,370
-11.70
-0.18%






S&P 500

2,470
-5.70
-0.23%









12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Chip stocks are cool again, but reality is here
                                





 
12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
                                





 
12:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Amazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
                                





 
12:17 P.M. ET


                                  Starbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


                                  Wage-rebound story takes another hit after drab ECI report
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      Why McCain shot down Obamacare repeal               
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      What is an ICO?
                                





 
12:06 P.M. ET


                                  Trump’s sketch of New York City skyline auctioned off
                                





 
12:04 P.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
                                





 
12:01 P.M. ET


Updated
      Health-care fund managers say a spike in drugs and devices will produce big returns
                                





 
12:00 P.M. ET


Updated
      These companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
                                





 
12:00 P.M. ET


                                  Stock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses
                                





 
11:59 A.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo will pay $80 million to overcharged auto loan consumers 
                                





 
11:56 A.M. ET


Updated
      Gold aims for third-weekly gain as dollar holds loss after GDP report
                                





 
11:56 A.M. ET


Updated
      Charting a bull-trend whipsaw, Nasdaq’s key reversal fuels sector rotation (again)
                                





 
11:51 A.M. ET


Updated
      A global investment strategist offers up a summer reading list to make you a better investor
                                





 
11:50 A.M. ET


Updated
      This fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
                                





 
11:50 A.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
                                





 
11:49 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
                                





 
11:48 A.M. ET


Updated
      What the solar eclipse on Aug. 21 will mean for stocks
                                





 








































Log In














Bulletin

Teavana shutdown by Starbucks called latest mall casualty


















Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: ENERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.
    






    By

Published: Aug 22, 2016 1:52 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  The following discussion should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included herein. We caution readers regarding certain forward looking statements in the following discussion and elsewhere in this report and in any other statement made by, or on our behalf, whether or not in future filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Forward looking statements are statements not based on historical information and which relate to future operations, strategies, financial results or other developments. Forward looking statements are necessarily based upon estimates and assumptions that are inherently subject to significant business, economic and competitive uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond our control and many of which, with respect to future business decisions, are subject to change. These uncertainties and contingencies can affect actual results and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in any forward looking statements made by, or on our behalf. We disclaim any obligation to update forward looking statements except as may be required under applicable securities laws.  Overview  ExeLED Holdings Inc. was incorporated in the State of Delaware on October 20, 1986 under the name "Verilink Corporation." We have also been known as Energie Holdings, Inc. and Alas Aviation Corp. On November 30, 2015, we filed a Certificate of Amendment to our Certificate of Incorporation with the State of Delaware to change our name from "Energie Holdings, Inc." to "ExeLED Holdings Inc." We have two wholly-owned subsidiaries, �nergie LLC (hereinafter referred to as "�nergie"), and OELC, LLC. All references herein to "us," "we," "our," "Holdings," or the "Company" refer to ExeLED Holdings Inc. and its subsidiaries, and their respective business following the consummation of the Merger and Share Exchange Agreements, unless the context otherwise requires.  We are a holding company engaged in the business of the import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets in North America. Our current business objective is to become a leading provider of advanced LED lighting solutions by acquiring and growing complementary LED based lighting fixture companies. We are focused on acquiring specialized LED lighting companies for the architecture and interior design markets for both commercial and residential applications, with the intention to grow, innovate, and fully capture the rapidly growing lighting market opportunities associated with solid state lighting. The lighting products will include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. These objectives are subject to our obtaining additional financing, of which there can be no assurance.  Our management team and advisory board is comprised of experienced executives in the lighting industry with recent specific focus on the LED lighting industry. The group has over 300 years of combined experience in this industry.  Our principal place of business is located at 4885 Ward Road, Suite 300, Wheat Ridge, Colorado, telephone (720) 963-8055. Our website is www.exeledholdings.com. �nergie also maintains a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. �nergie's website is www.energielighting.com.  Table of Contents 10  �nergie acts as our operating subsidiary. Our creative lighting products include both conventional fixtures and advanced solid-state technology that can integrate with digital controls and day-lighting to create energy efficiencies and a better visual environment. �nergie was founded in 2001and is engaged in the import and sale of specialized interior lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets in North America. We have developed an end-to-end production and distribution platform for imported lighting products featuring HID, fluorescent, and LED technologies. Long term contracts with five European manufacturers and one in Taiwan provide us with exclusive North American distribution rights to over 270 total products in 37 categories. After processing any modifications necessary to meet UL standards and building code requirements, the products are sold to customers through a network of over 60 independent lighting sales agents. In addition to a highly competitive commission structure, we provide our sales force with promotional materials, product training, and technical support.  Our independent accountants have expressed a "going concern" opinion. Our condensed consolidated financial statements have been prepared assuming that we will continue as a going concern, which contemplates the realization of assets and liquidation of liabilities in the normal course of business. The condensed consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustment that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.  Results of Operations Comparison of results of operations for the three months ended June 30, 2016 and 2015 Three months ended June 30, 2016 2015 Change % Sales revenue $ 206,592 $ 102,239 $ 104,353 102 % Cost of revenue (105,953 ) (47,986 ) (57,967 ) (121 )% Gross profit 100,639 54,253 46,386 85 % Total operating expenses 353,638 475,949 122,311 26 % Interest expense (418,051 ) (290,596 ) (127,455 ) 44 % Other income (expense) (37,894 ) (7,261 ) (30,633 ) 422 % Net loss $ (708,944 ) $ (719,553 ) $ 10,609 (1 )%  Sales Revenue, Cost of Revenue and Gross Profit  Sales revenue increased during the three months ended June 30, 2016 compared to 2015 due to a large order received in the second quarter of 2016. Cost of revenue increased proportionally to the increase in revenues.  Table of Contents 11  Operating expenses   Three months ended June 30, 2016 2015 Change % Research and development $ 70,615 $ 70,502 $ 113 0 % Sales and marketing 26,596 26,432 164 1 % General and administrative 256,427 379,015 (122,588 ) (32 )% $ 353,638 $ 475,949 $ (122,311 ) (26 )%  The decrease in operating expenses was driven by controlling our spending due to a limitation of funding.  Other  During the three months ended June 30, 2016, interest expense increased due to additional debt of approximately $1,100,000 over the same period in 2015.  Other income (expense) consists primarily of expenses related to costs associated with debt and conversions of debt.  Comparison of results of operations for the six months ended June 30, 2016 and 2015   Six months ended June 30, 2016 2015 Change % Sales revenue $ 305,147 $ 304,634 $ 513 0 % Cost of revenue (158,007 ) (145,992 ) (12,015 ) (8 )% Gross profit 147,140 158,642 (11,502 ) (7 )% Total operating expenses 790,119 981,994 191,875 20 % Interest expense (881,500 ) (490,956 ) (390,544 ) 80 % Other income (expense) (75,051 ) (17,530 ) (57,521 ) 328 % Net loss $ (1,599,530 ) $ (1,331,838 ) $ (267,692 ) 20 %  Table of Contents 12  Sales Revenue, Cost of Revenue and Gross Profit  Sales revenue remained consistent for the six months ended June 30, 2016 compared to 2015. Cost of revenue increased and gross profit decreased for the six months ended June 30, 2016 compared to 2015 due to an increase in inventory costs.  Operating expenses   Six months ended June 30, 2016 2015 Change % Research and development $ 143,606 $ 127,372 $ 16,234 13 % Sales and marketing 39,311 69,902 (30,591 ) (44 )% General and administrative 607,202 784,720 (177,518 ) (23 )% $ 790,119 $ 981,994 $ (191,875 ) (20 )%  The decrease in operating expenses was driven by controlling our spending due to a limitation of funding.  Other  During the six months ended June 30, 2016, interest expense increased due to additional debt of approximately $1,100,000 over the same period in 2015.  Other income (expense) consists primarily of expenses related to costs associated with debt and conversions of debt.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  At June 30, 2016, we had $90,794 in cash. We have not generated positive cash flows from operations. Accordingly, our sources of liquidity may include potential debt and equity offerings. We believe that our principal difficulty in our inability to successfully generate positive cash flows has been the lack of available capital to operate and expand our business. We believe we need a minimum of approximately $2,000,000 in additional working capital to be utilized for (i) development and launching of new products for Energie; (ii) funding the business development efforts to identify, qualify and acquire other LED lighting companies; and (iii) the balance for working capital, and general and administrative expense. Other than as disclosed below, we have no other commitments from any investor or investment-banking firm to provide us with the necessary funding and there can be no assurances we will obtain such funding in the future. Failure to obtain this additional financing will have a material negative impact on our ability to generate profits in the future.  To fund our acquisition plan and fund working capital for our continuing operations, we continue to seek out and discuss financing with potential partners or lenders. While no assurances can be provided, we expect that we will be able to obtain financing to implement our plans.  In August 2015, LG Capital Funding LLC, ("LG") purchased from KBM Worldwide, Inc., ("KBM") all outstanding convertible notes and accrued interest payable to KBM under previous agreements with KBM. The outstanding amount due to KBM was restructured into two new convertible notes under a Securities Purchase Agreement, Convertible Notes and other ancillary documents. Under these agreements, we issued 8% convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $188,684. These notes are convertible into shares of our common stock at a price ranging from 58% - 65% of the lowest closing bid price of our common stock during the 15 trading days immediately preceding the date of conversion. The notes contain additional terms and conditions normally included in instruments of this kind. During the six months ended June 30, 2016, LG converted $36,800 of principal and $2,029 of accrued interest into 44,059,044 shares of common stock.  Table of Contents 13  On July 16, 2014 we entered into an Investment Agreement and Registration Rights Agreement with Dutchess Opportunity Fund, II, LP ("Dutchess"). Pursuant to the Investment Agreement, Dutchess committed to purchase, subject to certain restrictions and conditions, up to $5 million of our common stock upon issuance by us of a put to Dutchess at a price equal to ninety-four percent (94%) of the lowest daily VWAP (volume weighted average price) of our common stock during the five (5) consecutive Trading Days beginning on the Put Notice Date and ending on and including the date that is four (4) Trading Days after such Put Notice Date. The Put Amount shall be equal to up to either 1) two hundred percent (200%) of the average daily volume (U.S. market only) of the common stock for the three  Working Capital  Working capital is the amount by which current assets exceed current liabilities. We had negative working capital of $10,649,341 and $8,468,294, respectively, as of June 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015. The increase in negative working capital is due to the increase in debt of approximately $720,000 and a resulting increase in accrued liabilities of approximately $310,000 from interest expense. We also currently have insufficient cash flow to meet our debt obligations. This raises substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern.  Cash Flows Our cash flows from operating, investing and financing activities were as follows: Six months ended June 30, 2016 2015 Net cash used in operating activities $ (506,038 ) $ (443,873 ) Net cash provided by financing activities 578,845 422,112  Net cash used in operating activities increased in 2016 by $62,165 compared to 2015. We relied heavily on increased debt, accounts payable, and accrued liabilities to keep our operations running. We anticipate that overhead costs in current operations will increase in the future if we are successful in raising the capital described herein as a result of our anticipated increased marketing and operating activities.  During 2016, we relied on additional borrowings under both new and existing debt agreements. In 2016, net cash flows provided by financing activities were composed of $815,116 of additional borrowings and $236,271 of debt pay down. In 2015, we borrowed $889,250 of additional debt and paid down $467,138 of debt.  Inflation  Although our operations are influenced by general economic conditions, we do not believe that inflation had a material effect on our results of operations during the six month period ended June 30, 2016.  Table of Contents 14  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  We had no off-balance sheet arrangements as of June 30, 2016 and December 31, 2015.  Critical Accounting Estimates  Our condensed consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. The preparation of these financial statements requires management to make estimates, judgments and assumptions that affect reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. We continually evaluate the accounting policies and estimates used to prepare the condensed consolidated financial statements. The estimates are based on historical experience and assumptions believed to be reasonable under current facts and circumstances. Actual amounts and results could differ from these estimates made by management. Certain accounting policies that require significant management estimates and are deemed critical to our results of operations or financial position are discussed in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015 in the Critical Accounting Policies section of Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.  Aug 22, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’


Jeff Bezos was the richest person in the world, for half a day


All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart










Most Popular





The dark side of cruises





Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.





Dow ends at record, but tech slump weighs on S&P 500, Nasdaq





If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one





How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay









            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment













Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 




















MarketWatch.com Topics

























X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Teavana shutdown by Starbucks called latest mall casualty »
        




Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




12:26 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:20pChip stocks are cool again, but reality is here
12:19pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
12:19pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
12:18pStarbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
12:10pWage-rebound story takes another hit after drab ECI report
12:09pWhat is an ICO?
12:09pWhy McCain shot down Obamacare repeal               
12:06pTrump’s sketch of New York City skyline auctioned off
12:05pWells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
12:02pHealth-care fund managers say a spike in drugs and devices will produce big returns
12:01pThese companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
12:00pStock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses
11:59aWells Fargo will pay $80 million to overcharged auto loan consumers 
11:56aGold aims for third-weekly gain as dollar holds loss after GDP report
11:56aCharting a bull-trend whipsaw, Nasdaq’s key reversal fuels sector rotation (again)
11:51aA global investment strategist offers up a summer reading list to make you a better investor
11:51aThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
11:50aWells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
11:49aHere’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
11:49aWhat the solar eclipse on Aug. 21 will mean for stocks
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,793.86

-2.69
-0.01%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,370.52

-11.66
-0.18%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.72

-5.70
-0.23%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































MarketWatch.com Topics

























X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Teavana shutdown by Starbucks called latest mall casualty »
        




Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




12:26 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:20pChip stocks are cool again, but reality is here
12:19pIntel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’
12:19pAmazon’s free-spending ways hit earnings, but don’t expect a shift to thrift
12:18pStarbucks’ Teavana stores are the latest casualty at the mall
12:10pWage-rebound story takes another hit after drab ECI report
12:09pWhat is an ICO?
12:09pWhy McCain shot down Obamacare repeal               
12:06pTrump’s sketch of New York City skyline auctioned off
12:05pWells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
12:02pHealth-care fund managers say a spike in drugs and devices will produce big returns
12:01pThese companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
12:00pStock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses
11:59aWells Fargo will pay $80 million to overcharged auto loan consumers 
11:56aGold aims for third-weekly gain as dollar holds loss after GDP report
11:56aCharting a bull-trend whipsaw, Nasdaq’s key reversal fuels sector rotation (again)
11:51aA global investment strategist offers up a summer reading list to make you a better investor
11:51aThis fund strategist says there’s at least one way companies can survive Amazon’s onslaught
11:50aWells Fargo: FDA plan to lower nicotine could be opportunity for Altria, Philip Morris
11:49aHere’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
11:49aWhat the solar eclipse on Aug. 21 will mean for stocks
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,794.33

-2.22
-0.01%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,370.52

-11.66
-0.18%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.68

-5.74
-0.23%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
















































 



ELED | Energie Holdings Inc. Lights Up The OTC Market –  Aim High Profits





















































Aim High Profits News 

Search this website





HomeAim High Profits News ELED | Energie Holdings Inc. Lights Up The OTC Market 






ELED | Energie Holdings Inc. Lights Up The OTC Market


When investors hear about a lighting company based out of Colorado, their first inclination is it’s another supplier who plans to target the marijuana sector with their state of the art LED products.  Nothing could be further from the truth for Energie Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: ELED) who’s product line is listed to have been in with some of the top Fortune 500 companies and higher education facilities throughout the U.S.  After any penny stock trader spends the minutes it takes to do some research on the seller and distributor of LED energy efficient products, seeing why the lights have been turned on for ELED stock displays what a bit of time can be worth. 
 

 
Energie Holdings provides its customers three product lines: pendant, surface, recessed and semi-recessed versions.  Comprised of 9 LED fixtures that were to be introduced to the market during the second quarter of 2015, top line numbers for Q3 should show some further improvement with these award-winning fixtures that combine hand-blown glass with modern LED technology being a part of their revenue stream from offices, restaurants, hotels and public buildings.
Visiting the company’s website to see their customer base, Microsoft, British Petroleum (BP), Honda and JP Morgan are just a couple of the A-listers there.  Although revenues only grew by about $38,000 to $202,395 for Q1 when compared to the $164,609 reported for Q1, 2014, there are some internal items that make ELED stock a bright one.
A year ago, on July 2, 2014, the Company completed a Share Exchange Agreement with Energie which called for the issuance of 33,000,000 “restricted” shares of ELED stock at $0.05 per share.  With just 59,505,676 shares issued and outstanding, that 36.5 million share float immediately puts this subpenny on the must watch list.
Digging into the debt of Energie Holdings, many will immediately shut the page when they see $5,316,025 due, $2,741,275 of which is current.  However, even with 250,000,000 authorized to be issued, understanding the debt makes it easier to determine why ELED stock is playable to much higher levels. 
Of the $5.3 million in liabilities, $3.98 million of it , entered into in December 2014, is held by Symbiote, Inc. with monthly principal and interest payable through November 2017.  Symbiote holds the largest ownership percentage in Energie Holdings, is the lessor of their manufacturing facility, and the provider of the company’s payroll services.
What’s more of a bullish reason to be paying close attention to ELED stock is that, of the $202,500 of convertible notes due between May and December of this year, portions can be converted at a rate of 61% of the average closing bid price of ELED stock during the 10 trading days immediately preceding the date of conversion.  During the three month period ended March 31, 2015, $15,000 of principal was converted into 2,307,692 shares which works out to be $0.0065 per share.  Using that as a guideline, ELED stock, rightfully, has earned it’s shine when it nearly surpassed $0.02 yesterday. 
 
We are 100% Anti-Spam and will never rent or sell your information.
 Many of our picks go up 100%, 200%, even 10,000%, see for yourself.
Stay Connected With Us: 








Email Address:*




 










Last updated by Timothy Richards at February 25, 2016.
Tweet
Share
29

JUL


0



Share on Twitter
Share on Facebook
Share on Google




Sign Up For Our Breaking Alerts


Email Address*

 









Recent News 
Profits Since August 1:  $81,574.43 @ 32Trades.com
Have you ever wondered what it would be like to be able to trade options?

Are you confused about all the terms and types o...


Penny Stocks | How I Made $17,330 In 4 Days Using DDAmanda
Trading penny stocks is risky - at least that's what the general consensus would have you believe.  For years now, AimHighPr...


$FB CALLS:  One Trade, $7,500 Profits
In case you've been under a rock or stuck on iHub trying to justify why or when diluting MM's are going to leave the OTC tick...


$AMZN 750 PUTS : $365 → $9,618 (2,914%) In Under 1 Hour
In case you've been under a rock or stuck on iHub trying to justify why or when diluting MM's are going to leave the OTC tick...


Top Traded OTC Stocks: November 7, 2016
There are many components to a successful penny stock trader and one of them is being able to identify what's hot and what's ...


Top Traded OTC Stocks: November 4, 2016
There are many components to a successful penny stock trader and one of them is being able to identify what's hot and what's ...

CategoriesSelect Category
Gold Stocks
Investing in Penny Stocks
Learn the Basics
Make Money
Penny Stocks
Penny Stocks In The News
Penny Stocks on the Move
Penny Stocks to Watch
Solar Energy Stocks
Stock Upgrades
Update
Volume Alerts




 




There Are Better OPTIONS Than OTC Stocks

Want To Trade Options Like TSLA?Your information will *never* be shared or sold to a 3rd party.There Are Better OPTIONS Than OTC Stocks

Want To Trade Options Like TSLA?Your information will *never* be shared or sold to a 3rd party.
























Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version



















Energie Holdings, Inc. Enters Into New Partnership With Regent





































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 










			You are here:  
		



							Home						


						»					





							Investors						


						»					





							Press Releases						


						»					




					Energie Holdings, Inc. Enters Into New Partnership With Regent				












							Energie Holdings, Inc. Enters Into New Partnership With Regent					



  

 Print 
 Email 




DENVER, CO--(Marketwired - Mar 20, 2014) -  Énergie Holdings, Inc. ("Energie" or the "Company") (OTCQB: ELED) announces that through its wholly owned subsidiary, Energie LLC, has recently received exclusive rights for rapid expansion of distribution in North America from Regent Beleuchtungskörper AG, a pioneering Swiss developer of LED energy efficient lighting systems. 
 
 
Energie and Regent have been working together for over ten years. Over the past several years, Regent has developed several LED product families that are targeted at meeting North American LED lighting demands. Energie intends to launch several of those product families in 2014-2015. The product families scheduled for launch by Energie in 2014-2015 are Channel LED, Flow LED and ITEM LED which represent major linear product opportunities because of their design aesthetic, quality of materials and construction, optical design and LED performance. Also scheduled for 2014-2015 launch are Solo LED and Solo Sky LED. These families are a new product category in North America that present strong opportunities in the architectural lighting market because of their unique shape and attention to installed details as well as utilizing high performance optics combined with LED technology.
 
Energie's business and distribution model, which utilizes 63 distributors throughout the US and Canada and European manufacturing partners, enabled the Company to achieve over $30,000,000 in revenues as a private company. The Company's exclusive agreement with Regent for these new product lines represents an estimated additional $10 million in revenue to the Company over the next several years and is just one step in its plan to substantially increase its revenues as a public company by leveraging its existing relationships through additional product offerings and strategic acquisitions.
 
Harold Hansen, the Founder and CEO of Energie stated: "This expanded opportunity represents a strong vote of confidence from Regent and is a significant step forward for Energie as we rapidly develop our LED lighting fixture product line. With access to Regent's technology and design, Energie will quickly bring more leading edge LED fixtures to the North American architectural lighting market."
 
Alessandro Sachs, Director of International Sales for Regent stated: "Regent is excited to expand our relationship with Energie. We are confident that with the strong investment coming from the OTCQB market, our mutual business will grow very quickly."
 
ABOUT REGENT: Regent is headquartered in Basel and has offices in India, Milan, Tel-Aviv, Vienna and Zurich. Regent is a pioneer in technologies such as: MDT, Senso Dim (Daylight Management System) and PAL (Perception Adaptive Lightsource). The Company has 500 employees worldwide. Regent has been a major source of innovative lighting ideas since 1908 and is one of the European market leaders receiving 700 orders per day. Regent has developed lighting systems that are trend-setting in design, function, and that are genuinely creative and aesthetically appealing utilizing cutting-edge technology.
 
ABOUT ÉNERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.: Énergie Holdings is focused on acquiring and growing companies that provide specialized LED lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets. The Company is headquartered in Wheat Ridge, Colorado and also maintains a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. The Company currently has a large installed base of customers in all 50 States and Canada. Énergie' LLC, the subsidiary business, is based upon partnerships with various European suppliers of innovative highly efficient LED lighting technology. 
 
For more information about Énergie Holdings visit http://www.energieholdings.com
 
Disclaimer
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements based on the beliefs of Énergie's management. When used in this press release, words such as "anticipate", "believe", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "plan" and "project" are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such statements reflect the views of Énergie as of the date made with respect to future events and are subject to risks and uncertainties. Many factors could cause actual results to be materially different from those projected here, including, among others, changes in general economic and business conditions, changes in currency exchange rates and interest rates, introduction of competing products, lack of acceptance of new products or services and changes in business strategy. Énergie disclaims any intention or obligation to update these forward-looking statements.
 
Contact:
For Information emailEnergie HoldingsThis email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.Or contact Investor Relations 888-490-0708 









 











Social Networks

  











  


























ExeLED Holdings, Inc.







































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact






















  



























Investors





































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 










			You are here:  
		



							Home						


						»					




					Investors				












							Investors					



  

 Print 
 Email 




 

 
Advisors & BankersAccountants: BF Borgers CPA PCBank: AMG National Trust BankLegal: Sichenzia Ross Friedman Ference, LLP Share Transfer AgentsPacific Stock Transfer702-361-3033 P702-433-1979 Fhttp://www.pacificstocktransfer.com Investor RelationsInvestor Relations: Hanover International, Inc.720-361-2060This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.
 Stock Exchange DetailsOTCPINKTICKER: ELED
ELED Current Quote
Loading data...

ELED SEC Filings
Loading data...

 
 









 











Social Networks

  











  



























Subsidiary





































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 










			You are here:  
		



							Home						


						»					




					Subsidiary				












							Subsidiary					



  

 Print 
 Email 




The Énergie promise: Fresh design; real world practicality.
Énergie is devoted to satisfying a growing demand for unique architectural lighting products. We accomplish this by partnering with leading European manufacturers to bring their newest and best designs into North America.
 Our focus is on lighting that appeals to the senses, that adds dramatic effect, highlighting architecture and surroundings in imaginative new ways. We also seek high levels of lighting performance and efficiency – products that deliver utmost visual comfort while conserving energy.  The broad Énergie collection includes some of the world's most advanced linear systems, pendants and wall-mounted lighting products. Every design is an original – and completely unique in the markets we serve.  It's important to know Énergie is not simply an importer. We carefully test, evaluate and select only those designs that will integrate smoothly with North American building design and construction methodologies. We invest in the re-engineering necessary to meet all domestic requirements. And we assemble, inventory, package and ship from our midwest operations centers, providing the same timely delivery you've come to expect from leading U.S. manufacturers. All of our products are UL/CUL listed, competitively priced, and readily available.
 

 
Énergie offers experienced customer service assistance to answer product inquiries and application questions. Our working relationships with top lighting agencies in major markets across the U.S. and Canada assure on-the-spot attention during every phase of your project from planning through installation.  We invite you to visit Énergie headquarters/showroom in Wheat Ridge, Colorado. In addition to tours, the facility is available for agent and specifier product training, and seminars are offered for continuing education credits. Call 720.963.8055 x115 for more information.
http://www.energielighting.com 









 











Social Networks

  











  


























Contact








































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 










			You are here:  
		



							Home						


						»					




					Contact				











Contact  form


Contact


Contact Form



Send an Email. All fields with an asterisk (*) are required.


	Name *





	Email *





	Subject *





	Message *








Send Email




 



Miscellaneous Information




 



4885 Ward Road, Suite 300 Wheat Ridge, Colorado 80033
Tel: 720-361-2056 
Investor Relations: ir@exeledholdings.com
IR: 720-361-2060 












 











Social Networks

  











  



























Energie Holdings, Inc. Announces New Partnership With RZB Gmbh





































HomeAbout ExeLEDGalleryEHI Acquisition, detailed PDFSubsidiaryEnergie LLCCustomersProductsWebsiteInvestorsPress ReleasesFilings & FinancialsIndustry NewsContact








 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 










			You are here:  
		



							Home						


						»					





							Investors						


						»					





							Press Releases						


						»					




					Energie Holdings, Inc. Announces New Partnership With RZB Gmbh				












							Energie Holdings, Inc. Announces New Partnership With RZB Gmbh					



  

 Print 
 Email 




DENVER, CO--(Marketwired - Feb 11, 2014) - Énergie Holdings, Inc. formerly Alas Aviation Corp., (OTCQB: ALAS) ("Energie" or the "Company") announces its wholly owned subsidiary, Énergie LLC has entered into a new partnership with RZB Gmbh, one of the most influential enterprises in the European lighting industry, based in Bamberg, Germany to develop and market its ground breaking LED technology in North America.
 
 
Énergie LLC will be introducing three families of products from its newest partner, RZB, from Bamberg, Germany, in the spring of 2014. RING OF FIRE is a modern masterpiece of craftsmanship combining a hand-blown satin glass and aluminum enclosure with advanced LED technology. The award-winning pendant fixture is a visually stunning example of contemporary form and light. The DOUALA and DOUALA WHITE families both include hand blown opal glass diffusers and sophisticated LED technology in a classic round architectural shape. With pendant, surface-mount, semi-recessed and recessed versions, the award-winning DOUALA families represent a range of options suitable for offices, restaurants, hotels and public buildings. All three product families use LED lighting that creates light comparable to incandescent bulbs using up to 85% less energy and lasting up to 50 times longer.
 
The International Sales Director for RZB, Pascal Rinckenberger, said, "We feel that having Énergie as our North American partner with their distribution network and Michigan assembly facility, will speed our introduction into the market."
 
Harold Hansen, the Founder of Énergie LLC and CEO of Énergie Holdings, Inc. states: "This opportunity is a great example of the value Énergie LLC and Énergie Holdings brings to our global partners. RZB gets their innovative LED products into the North American architectural lighting market place quickly and cost-effectively by leveraging the tested Énergie LLC business platform. Both companies expect to experience a long, productive and expanding business relationship."
 
ABOUT RZB Gmbh: RZB is based in historic Bamberg, Germany and was founded 70 years ago. With 500 employees, RZB is known for inventive change, helping to shape the future of lighting technology and design. Product development efforts are spurred by a collaboration of LED design engineers working closely with internationally-known industrial designers to produce award-winning lighting products that are a marriage of sophisticated technology and the art of design.
 
ABOUT ÉNERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.: Énergie Holdings is focused on acquiring and growing companies that provide specialized LED lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets. The Company is headquartered in Wheat Ridge, Colorado and also maintains a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. The Company currently has a large installed base of customers in all 50 States and Canada. Énergie LLC, the subsidiary business, is based upon partnerships with various European suppliers of innovative highly efficient LED lighting technology. Énergie LLC is capitalizing on the desire of these European lighting companies to penetrate the North American markets by solving many of the problems these manufacturers encounter when approaching the market. Énergie LLC's business strategy is to enter into exclusive sales agreements with European suppliers that have unique lighting products; and to bridge the divide between North American architects' and designers' desired access to innovative European products and European manufacturers' desire to find a cost effective way to penetrate the North American markets for their products.
 
For more information about RZB visit http://www.rzb.de/en/
 
For more information about Énergie Holdings visit http://www.energieholdings.com
 
For Information email This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.
 
Or contact Investor Relations at 888-490-0708
 
Disclaimer
 
This press release contains forward-looking statements based on the beliefs of Énergie's management. When used in this press release, words such as "anticipate", "believe", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "plan" and "project" are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such statements reflect the views of Énergie as of the date made with respect to future events and are subject to risks and uncertainties. Many factors could cause actual results to be materially different from those projected here, including, among others, changes in general economic and business conditions, changes in currency exchange rates and interest rates, introduction of competing products, lack of acceptance of new products or services and changes in business strategy. Énergie disclaims any intention or obligation to update these forward-looking statements.
 
Contact:
For more information contact Investor RelationsEnergie Holdings888-490-0708 









 











Social Networks

  











  























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Energie Holdings, Inc. Enters Into New Partnership With RegentHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 3 hrs 34 minsS&P 5002,469.72-5.70 (-0.23%)Dow 3021,793.63-2.92 (-0.01%)Nasdaq6,370.49-11.69 (-0.18%)Stocks to WatchIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingEnergie Holdings, Inc. Enters Into New Partnership With RegentMarketwiredMarch 20, 2014ReblogShareTweetShareDENVER, CO--(Marketwired - Mar 20, 2014) -  Énergie Holdings, Inc. ("Energie" or the "Company") (  OTCQB :  ELED ) announces that through its wholly owned subsidiary, Energie LLC, has recently received exclusive rights for rapid expansion of distribution in North America from Regent Beleuchtungskörper AG, a pioneering Swiss developer of LED energy efficient lighting systems. Energie and Regent have been working together for over ten years. Over the past several years, Regent has developed several LED product families that are targeted at meeting North American LED lighting demands. Energie intends to launch several of those product families in 2014-2015. The product families scheduled for launch by Energie in 2014-2015 are Channel LED, Flow LED and ITEM LED which represent major linear product opportunities because of their design aesthetic, quality of materials and construction, optical design and LED performance. Also scheduled for 2014-2015 launch are Solo LED and Solo Sky LED. These families are a new product category in North America that present strong opportunities in the architectural lighting market because of their unique shape and attention to installed details as well as utilizing high performance optics combined with LED technology.Energie's business and distribution model, which utilizes 63 distributors throughout the US and Canada and European manufacturing partners, enabled the Company to achieve over $30,000,000 in revenues as a private company. The Company's exclusive agreement with Regent for these new product lines represents an estimated additional $10 million in revenue to the Company over the next several years and is just one step in its plan to substantially increase its revenues as a public company by leveraging its existing relationships through additional product offerings and strategic acquisitions.Harold Hansen, the Founder and CEO of Energie stated: "This expanded opportunity represents a strong vote of confidence from Regent and is a significant step forward for Energie as we rapidly develop our LED lighting fixture product line. With access to Regent's technology and design, Energie will quickly bring more leading edge LED fixtures to the North American architectural lighting market."Alessandro Sachs, Director of International Sales for Regent stated: "Regent is excited to expand our relationship with Energie. We are confident that with the strong investment coming from the OTCQB market, our mutual business will grow very quickly."ABOUT REGENT: Regent is headquartered in Basel and has offices in India, Milan, Tel-Aviv, Vienna and Zurich. Regent is a pioneer in technologies such as: MDT, Senso Dim (Daylight Management System) and PAL (Perception Adaptive Lightsource). The Company has 500 employees worldwide. Regent has been a major source of innovative lighting ideas since 1908 and is one of the European market leaders receiving 700 orders per day. Regent has developed lighting systems that are trend-setting in design, function, and that are genuinely creative and aesthetically appealing utilizing cutting-edge technology.ABOUT ÉNERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.: Énergie Holdings is focused on acquiring and growing companies that provide specialized LED lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets. The Company is headquartered in Wheat Ridge, Colorado and also maintains a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. The Company currently has a large installed base of customers in all 50 States and Canada. Énergie' LLC, the subsidiary business, is based upon partnerships with various European suppliers of innovative highly efficient LED lighting technology. For more information about Énergie Holdings visit http://www.energieholdings.comDisclaimerThis press release contains forward-looking statements based on the beliefs of Énergie's management. When used in this press release, words such as "anticipate", "believe", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "plan" and "project" are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such statements reflect the views of Énergie as of the date made with respect to future events and are subject to risks and uncertainties. Many factors could cause actual results to be materially different from those projected here, including, among others, changes in general economic and business conditions, changes in currency exchange rates and interest rates, introduction of competing products, lack of acceptance of new products or services and changes in business strategy. Énergie disclaims any intention or obligation to update these forward-looking statements.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextApollo raises $24.6 billion for largest private equity fund everReutersThis Will Takeover Solar & Electricity Energy SoonBanyan HillSponsoredFiat Chrysler posts earnings beat as North America hits record profitabilityFox BusinessClimate change will feed wildfires: expertsAFPGM and Ford Grow Ever-More Dependent on Declining Home MarketBloombergEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredRobust traffic helps Air France-KLM profit take offAFPTax cuts just got more likelyYahoo FinanceTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo FinanceZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingYahoo FinanceXbox Live Games With Gold for August 2017InvestorPlacePogue: The business of keeping 5,000 kitchens out of landfillsYahoo Finance Video"Women Need To Carry This Device With Them"Siren SongSponsoredStocks whiff as earnings and economic data pour inYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderTrump headed to Long Island to trumpet MS-13 crackdownFtheWorld: Kill them all. Don't detain them and waste tax payers' money. Criminals must be terminated.Join the Conversation1 / 51k








Energie Holdings, Inc. Announces New Partnership With RZB GmbhHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 3 hrs 34 minsS&P 5002,469.72-5.70 (-0.23%)Dow 3021,793.63-2.92 (-0.01%)Nasdaq6,370.49-11.69 (-0.18%)Stocks to WatchIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingEnergie Holdings, Inc. Announces New Partnership With RZB GmbhMarketwiredFebruary 11, 2014ReblogShareTweetShareDENVER, CO--(Marketwired - Feb 11, 2014) - Énergie Holdings, Inc. formerly Alas Aviation Corp., (  OTCQB :  ALAS ) ("Energie" or the "Company") announces its wholly owned subsidiary, Énergie LLC has entered into a new partnership with RZB Gmbh, one of the most influential enterprises in the European lighting industry, based in Bamberg, Germany to develop and market its ground breaking LED technology in North America.Énergie LLC will be introducing three families of products from its newest partner, RZB, from Bamberg, Germany, in the spring of 2014. RING OF FIRE is a modern masterpiece of craftsmanship combining a hand-blown satin glass and aluminum enclosure with advanced LED technology. The award-winning pendant fixture is a visually stunning example of contemporary form and light. The DOUALA and DOUALA WHITE families both include hand blown opal glass diffusers and sophisticated LED technology in a classic round architectural shape. With pendant, surface-mount, semi-recessed and recessed versions, the award-winning DOUALA families represent a range of options suitable for offices, restaurants, hotels and public buildings. All three product families use LED lighting that creates light comparable to incandescent bulbs using up to 85% less energy and lasting up to 50 times longer.The International Sales Director for RZB, Pascal Rinckenberger, said, "We feel that having Énergie as our North American partner with their distribution network and Michigan assembly facility, will speed our introduction into the market."Harold Hansen, the Founder of Énergie LLC and CEO of Énergie Holdings, Inc. states: "This opportunity is a great example of the value Énergie LLC and Énergie Holdings brings to our global partners. RZB gets their innovative LED products into the North American architectural lighting market place quickly and cost-effectively by leveraging the tested Énergie LLC business platform. Both companies expect to experience a long, productive and expanding business relationship."ABOUT RZB Gmbh: RZB is based in historic Bamberg, Germany and was founded 70 years ago. With 500 employees, RZB is known for inventive change, helping to shape the future of lighting technology and design. Product development efforts are spurred by a collaboration of LED design engineers working closely with internationally-known industrial designers to produce award-winning lighting products that are a marriage of sophisticated technology and the art of design.ABOUT ÉNERGIE HOLDINGS, INC.: Énergie Holdings is focused on acquiring and growing companies that provide specialized LED lighting solutions to the architecture and interior design markets. The Company is headquartered in Wheat Ridge, Colorado and also maintains a production and assembly facility in Zeeland, Michigan. The Company currently has a large installed base of customers in all 50 States and Canada. Énergie LLC, the subsidiary business, is based upon partnerships with various European suppliers of innovative highly efficient LED lighting technology. Énergie LLC is capitalizing on the desire of these European lighting companies to penetrate the North American markets by solving many of the problems these manufacturers encounter when approaching the market. Énergie LLC's business strategy is to enter into exclusive sales agreements with European suppliers that have unique lighting products; and to bridge the divide between North American architects' and designers' desired access to innovative European products and European manufacturers' desire to find a cost effective way to penetrate the North American markets for their products.For more information about RZB visit http://www.rzb.de/en/For more information about Énergie Holdings visit http://www.energieholdings.comFor Information email IR@energieholdings.comOr contact Investor Relations at 888-490-0708DisclaimerThis press release contains forward-looking statements based on the beliefs of Énergie's management. When used in this press release, words such as "anticipate", "believe", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "plan" and "project" are intended to identify forward-looking statements. Such statements reflect the views of Énergie as of the date made with respect to future events and are subject to risks and uncertainties. Many factors could cause actual results to be materially different from those projected here, including, among others, changes in general economic and business conditions, changes in currency exchange rates and interest rates, introduction of competing products, lack of acceptance of new products or services and changes in business strategy. Énergie disclaims any intention or obligation to update these forward-looking statements.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextApollo raises $24.6 billion for largest private equity fund everReutersEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredFiat Chrysler posts earnings beat as North America hits record profitabilityFox BusinessClimate change will feed wildfires: expertsAFPGM and Ford Grow Ever-More Dependent on Declining Home MarketBloombergZuckerberg Wife's Ambitious Secret Finally ExposedUNewz.MeSponsoredRobust traffic helps Air France-KLM profit take offAFPTax cuts just got more likelyYahoo FinanceTrump’s unwitting legacy could be universal health coverageYahoo Finance"Women Need To Carry This Device With Them"Siren SongSponsoredIntel impresses with strong quarter, Starbucks and Mattel shares are tankingYahoo FinanceXbox Live Games With Gold for August 2017InvestorPlacePogue: The business of keeping 5,000 kitchens out of landfillsYahoo Finance VideoDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredStocks whiff as earnings and economic data pour inYahoo FinanceSean Hannity responds to claim he ran up a $42,000 tab at Trump's hotel after flying in a 70-year-old lobster from MaineBusiness InsiderTrump headed to Long Island to trumpet MS-13 crackdownFtheWorld: Kill them all. Don't detain them and waste tax payers' money. Criminals must be terminated.Join the Conversation1 / 51k








